Illinois, session 104th, HB4966.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Reference to Act. This Act may be referred to as 5the Safeguards to Ensure Continuity and Uphold Rights and 6Equity (SECURE) Act. 7    Section 3. Legislative findings and intent. The General 8Assembly finds and declares:9    (1) Youth in the care and custody of the Department of 10Children and Family Services deserve all the legal protections 11available under the law, but the current legal protections 12available to these youth require a suite of statutory 13enhancements.14    (2) Illinois retains a non-delegable duty to safeguard 15their safety, health, dignity, and well-being.16    (3) Out-of-state placements do not diminish Illinois' 17responsibility to ensure youth are not subjected to 18foreseeable harm, discrimination, or denial of care that would 19be lawful and medically appropriate under Illinois law.20    (4) Youth in foster care experience disproportionate rates 21of trauma and unmet medical, reproductive, sexual, and 22gender-related health needs, which may emerge over time and 23require ongoing monitoring and appropriate treatment.  HB4966- 2 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    (5) Youth voice is essential to sound child welfare 2decision-making.3    (6) The State of Illinois, including the Department of 4Children and Family Services, must respect and meaningfully 5consider a youth's expressed preferences in placement options 6while conducting transparent, individualized risk assessments.7    (7) Regular Illinois-based caseworker contact is necessary 8to identify emerging needs, including pregnancy-related care, 9contraception, and treatment of sexually transmitted 10infections.11    (8) Caseworkers coordinating and delivering services on 12behalf of youth placed out-of-state need protection from civil 13liability for these duties, provided they are acting in good 14faith and within the scope of their duties and not engaged in 15willful or wanton conduct.16    (9) Contracted providers and caregivers receiving State 17funds must comply with Illinois standards as a condition of 18licensure and contracting.19    (10) To protect children from harm resulting from 20violations of specified provisions of this Amendatory Act of 21the 104th General Assembly and to ensure effective enforcement 22of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, a 23private right of action is necessary.24    (11) The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th 25General Assembly shall be liberally construed to protect 26children's safety, dignity, well-being, and rights.   HB4966- 3 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 2by changing Sections 6a and 7 and by adding Sections 7.29, 37.30, 7.31, 7.32, and 7.33 as follows: 4    (20 ILCS 505/6a)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5006a)5    Sec. 6a. Case plan. 6    (a) With respect to each Department client for whom the 7Department is providing placement service, the Department 8shall develop a case plan designed to stabilize the family 9situation and prevent placement of a child outside the home of 10the family when the child can be cared for at home without 11endangering the child's health or safety, reunify the family 12if temporary placement is necessary when safe and appropriate, 13or move the child toward an appropriate permanent living 14arrangement and permanent legal status, consistent with the 15child's best interest, using the factors set forth in 16subsection (4.05) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 171987. Such case plan shall provide for the utilization of 18family preservation services as defined in Section 8.2 of the 19Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act. Such case plan shall 20be reviewed and updated every 6 months. The Department shall 21ensure that incarcerated parents are able to participate in 22case plan reviews via teleconference or videoconference. Where 23appropriate, the case plan shall include recommendations 24concerning alcohol or drug abuse evaluation.  HB4966- 4 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    If the parent is incarcerated, the case plan must address 2the tasks that must be completed by the parent and how the 3parent will participate in the administrative case review and 4permanency planning hearings and, wherever possible, must 5include treatment that reflects the resources available at the 6facility where the parent is confined. The case plan must 7provide for visitation opportunities, unless visitation is not 8in the best interests of the child. 9    (a-5)(1) As used in this subsection, "caregiver" means the 10person providing substitute care for a child. For placements 11licensed by the Department under the Child Care Act of 1969 12that utilize a shift staff model to provide daily supervision 13of youth, such as congregate care placements, "caregiver" 14means a staff member employed to provide such care for the 15child.16    (2) The case plan shall include specific, concrete tasks 17and responsibilities for the child's caregiver to ensure each 18child is provided with safe, proper, and supportive care based 19on the child's needs and best interests, including, but not 20limited to, the child's protected characteristics as defined 21under the Illinois Human Rights Act, and in alignment with the 22requirements of Sections 7, 7.29, and 7.30 of this Act.23    (3) The caregiver's case plan tasks shall include, at a 24minimum, the duty to:25        (A) ensure that the child's daily physical, emotional, 26    developmental, educational, cultural, and social needs are   HB4966- 5 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    met;2        (B) maintain an environment providing supportive care 3    as defined under subsection (b) of Section 7.29 of this 4    Act to treat the child in a manner that meets the child's 5    need for safety and security, is free from harassment and 6    abuse, and is supportive of the child's identity, 7    including, but not limited to, the child's race, color, 8    national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, 9    disability, religion, pregnancy, reproductive health 10    decisions, and any other characteristic protected under 11    the Illinois Human Rights Act;12        (C) collaborate with the child's parents, the 13    Department, and service providers, when appropriate and 14    consistent with the child's safety and permanency plan, to 15    promote the child's well-being and connection to family 16    and community; and17        (D) ensure the caregiver does not engage in 18    discriminatory conduct.19    Case plans shall address each child's health care needs 20and, if a need is identified, specify steps the Department and 21caregivers shall take to ensure timely provision of health 22care, including, but not limited to, arranging transportation 23and ensuring the child can attend appointments. If the 24Department is placing or has placed a child in a jurisdiction 25outside the State of Illinois, and that jurisdiction exposes a 26child to risk of adverse action, as defined in subsection (b)   HB4966- 6 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1of Section 7.30, the case plan shall include provisions 2requiring the Department to take all necessary measures to 3ensure that the child continues to receive the full 4protections and benefits guaranteed by the laws of this State 5as required under Sections 7, 7.29, 7.30, and 7.31. This 6includes, but is not limited to, coordination with 7out-of-state providers or Illinois-based providers to ensure 8that a child can access and receive health care, including 9mental health care, lawful in the State of Illinois. The 10Department shall document in the case plan the steps the 11Department has taken to fulfill the obligations under this 12subsection (a-5) and Sections 7, 7.29, 7.30, and 7.31 and 13report this information to the court as part of the 14Department's required efforts under Section 2-28 of the 15Juvenile Court Act of 1987.16    (4) The Department shall provide guidance, support, and 17training to caregivers to ensure they have the knowledge, 18resources, and skills necessary to meet the responsibilities 19described in this subsection, including culturally responsive 20and trauma-informed care practices. Caregivers shall agree to 21abide by the caregiver obligations required by the case plan 22prior to the child's placement and throughout the duration of 23a child's placement with the caregivers. The Department shall 24monitor the caregiver's compliance with these requirements and 25document this compliance supporting the Department's 26determination of the continued appropriateness of this   HB4966- 7 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1placement as part of the child's case review and permanency 2hearing process required under this Act and report this 3information to the court as part of the Department's required 4efforts under Sections 2-27.4 and 2-28 of the Juvenile Court 5Act of 1987.6    (5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit 7or diminish:8        (A) the rights of a child to be free from 9    discrimination or to receive care consistent with the 10    protections guaranteed under State and federal law; or11        (B) the Department's obligation to act in the best 12    interest of a child. 13    (b) The Department may enter into written agreements with 14child welfare agencies to establish and implement case plan 15demonstration projects. The demonstration projects shall 16require that service providers develop, implement, review and 17update client case plans. The Department shall examine the 18effectiveness of the demonstration projects in promoting the 19family reunification or the permanent placement of each client 20and shall report its findings to the General Assembly no later 21than 90 days after the end of the fiscal year in which any such 22demonstration project is implemented.23(Source: P.A. 103-1061, eff. 7-1-25.) 24    (20 ILCS 505/7)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5007)25    Sec. 7. Placement of children; considerations.   HB4966- 8 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    (a) In placing any child under this Act, the Department 2shall place the child, as far as possible, in the care and 3custody of some individual holding the same religious belief 4as the parents of the child, or with some child care facility 5which is operated by persons of like religious faith as the 6parents of such child.7    (a-5) In placing a child under this Act, the Department 8shall place the child with the child's sibling or siblings 9under Section 7.4 of this Act unless the placement is not in 10each child's best interest, or is otherwise not possible under 11the Department's rules. If the child is not placed with a 12sibling under the Department's rules, the Department shall 13consider placements that are likely to develop, preserve, 14nurture, and support sibling relationships, where doing so is 15in each child's best interest. 16    (b) In placing a child under this Act, the Department 17shall place a child with a relative if the Department 18determines that the relative will be able to adequately 19provide for the child's safety and welfare based on the 20factors set forth in the Department's rules governing such 21placements, and that the placement is consistent with the 22child's best interests, taking into consideration the factors 23set out in subsection (4.05) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile 24Court Act of 1987. 25    When the Department first assumes custody of a child, in 26placing that child under this Act, the Department shall make   HB4966- 9 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1reasonable efforts to identify, locate, and provide notice to 2all adult grandparents and other adult relatives of the child 3who are ready, willing, and able to care for the child. At a 4minimum, these diligent efforts shall be renewed each time the 5child requires a placement change and it is appropriate for 6the child to be cared for in a home environment. The Department 7must document its efforts to identify, locate, and provide 8notice to such potential relative placements and maintain the 9documentation in the child's case file. The Department shall 10complete the following initial family finding and relative 11engagement efforts: 12        (1) The Department shall conduct an investigation in 13    order to identify and locate all grandparents, parents of 14    a sibling of the child, if the parent has legal custody of 15    the sibling, adult siblings, other adult relatives of the 16    minor including any other adult relatives suggested by the 17    parents, and, if it is known or there is reason to know the 18    child is an Indian child, any extended family members, as 19    defined in Section 4 of the Indian Child Welfare Act of 20    1978 (25 U.S.C. 1903). The Department shall make diligent 21    efforts to investigate the names and locations of the 22    relatives, including, but not limited to, asking the child 23    in an age-appropriate manner and consistent with the 24    child's best interest about any parent, alleged parent, 25    and relatives important to the child, and obtaining 26    information regarding the location of the child's parents,   HB4966- 10 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    alleged parents, and adult relatives. 2        As used in this subsection (b), "family finding and 3    relative engagement" means conducting an investigation, 4    including, but not limited to, through a computer-based 5    search engine, to identify any person who would be 6    eligible to be a relative caregiver as defined in Section 7    4d of this Act and to connect a child, consistent with the 8    child's best interest, who may be disconnected from the 9    child's parents, with those relatives and kin in an effort 10    to provide family support or possible placement. If it is 11    known or there is reason to know that the child is an 12    Indian child, as defined in Section 4 of the Indian Child 13    Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. 1903), "family finding and 14    relative engagement" also includes contacting the Indian 15    child's tribe to identify relatives and kin. No later than 16    July 1, 2025, the Department shall adopt rules setting 17    forth specific criteria as to family finding and relative 18    engagement efforts under this subsection (b) and under 19    Section 2-27.3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, 20    including determining the manner in which efforts may or 21    may not be appropriate, consistent with the best interests 22    of the child. 23        (2) In accordance with Section 471(a)(29) of the 24    Social Security Act, the Department shall make diligent 25    efforts to provide all adult relatives who are located 26    with written notification and oral notification, in person   HB4966- 11 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    or by telephone, of all the following information: 2            (i) the minor has been removed from the custody of 3        the minor's parent or guardian; and4            (ii) an explanation of the various options to 5        participate in the care and placement of the minor and 6        support for the minor's family, including any options 7        that may expire by failing to respond. The notice 8        shall provide information about providing care for the 9        minor while the family receives reunification services 10        with the goal of returning the child to the parent or 11        guardian, how to become a certified relative caregiver 12        home, and additional services and support that are 13        available in substitute care. The notice shall also 14        include information regarding, adoption and subsidized 15        guardianship assistance options, health care coverage 16        for youth in care under the medical assistance program 17        established under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid 18        Code, and other options for contact with the minor, 19        including, but not limited to, visitation. Upon 20        establishing the Department's kinship navigator 21        program, the notice shall also include information 22        regarding that benefit.23    No later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall adopt or 24amend existing rules to implement the requirements of this 25subsection, including what constitutes "diligent efforts" and 26when exceptions, consistent with federal law, are appropriate.  HB4966- 12 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    (b-5)(1) If the Department determines that a placement 2with any identified relative is not in the child's best 3interests or that the relative does not meet the requirements 4to be a relative caregiver, as set forth in Department rules or 5by statute, the Department must document the basis for that 6decision, maintain the documentation in the child's case file, 7inform the identified relative of the relative's right to 8reconsideration of the decision to deny placement with the 9identified relative, provide the identified relative with a 10description of the reconsideration process established in 11accordance with subsection (o) of Section 5 of this Act, and 12report this information to the court in accordance with the 13requirements of Section 2-27.3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 141987. 15    If, pursuant to the Department's rules, any person files 16an administrative appeal of the Department's decision not to 17place a child with a relative, it is the Department's burden to 18prove that the decision is consistent with the child's best 19interests. The Department shall report information related to 20these appeals pursuant to Section 46 of this Act. 21     When the Department determines that the child requires 22placement in an environment, other than a home environment, 23the Department shall continue to make reasonable efforts to 24identify and locate relatives to serve as visitation resources 25for the child and potential future placement resources, unless 26excused by the court, as outlined in Section 2-27.3 of the   HB4966- 13 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 2    If the Department determines that efforts to identify and 3locate relatives would be futile or inconsistent with the 4child's best interests, the Department shall document the 5basis of its determination and maintain the documentation in 6the child's case file.7    If the Department determines that an individual or a group 8of relatives are inappropriate to serve as visitation 9resources or possible placement resources, the Department 10shall document the basis of its determination, maintain the 11documentation in the child's case file, inform the identified 12relative of the relative's right to a reconsideration of the 13decision to deny visitation with the identified relative, 14provide the identified relative with a description of the 15reconsideration process established in accordance with 16subsection (o) of Section 5 of this Act, and report this 17information to the court in accordance with the requirements 18of Section 2-27.3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.19    When the Department determines that an individual or a 20group of relatives are appropriate to serve as visitation 21resources or possible future placement resources, the 22Department shall document the basis of its determination, 23maintain the documentation in the child's case file, create a 24visitation or transition plan, or both, and incorporate the 25visitation or transition plan, or both, into the child's case 26plan. The Department shall report this information to the   HB4966- 14 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1court as part of the Department's family finding and relative 2engagement efforts required under Section 2-27.3 of the 3Juvenile Court Act of 1987. For the purpose of this 4subsection, any determination as to the child's best interests 5shall include consideration of the factors set out in 6subsection (4.05) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 71987. 8    (2) The Department may initially place a child in a foster 9family home as defined under Section 2.17 of the Child Care Act 10of 1969 or a certified relative caregiver home as defined 11under Section 4d of this Act. Initial placement may also be 12made with a relative who is not yet a certified relative 13caregiver if all of the following conditions are met:14        (A) The prospective relative caregiver and all other 15    adults in the home must authorize and submit to a 16    background screening that includes the components set 17    forth in subsection (c) of Section 3.4 of the Child Care 18    Act of 1969. If the results of a check of the Law 19    Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS) identifies a 20    prior criminal conviction of (i) the prospective relative 21    caregiver for an offense not prohibited under subsection 22    (c) of Section 3.4 of the Child Care Act of 1969 or (ii) 23    any other adult in the home for a felony offense, the 24    Department shall thoroughly investigate and evaluate the 25    criminal history, including an assessment of the person's 26    character and the impact that the criminal history has on   HB4966- 15 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    the prospective relative caregiver's ability to parent the 2    child. The investigation must consider the type of crime, 3    the number of crimes, the nature of the offense, the age of 4    the person at the time of the crime, the length of time 5    that has elapsed since the last conviction, the 6    relationship of the crime to the ability to care for 7    children, the role that the person will have with the 8    child, and any evidence of rehabilitation. Initial 9    placement may not be made if the results of a check of the 10    Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS) identifies a 11    prior criminal conviction of the prospective relative 12    caregiver for an offense prohibited under subsection (c) 13    of Section 3.4 of the Child Care Act of 1969; however, a 14    waiver may be granted for placement of the child in 15    accordance with subsection (v-4) of Section 5. 16        (B) The home safety and needs assessment requirements 17    set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 18    3.4 of the Child Care Act of 1969 are satisfied. 19        (C) The prospective relative caregiver is able to meet 20    the physical, emotional, medical, and educational needs of 21    the specific child or children being placed by the 22    Department. 23    No later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall adopt 24rules or amend existing rules to implement the provisions of 25this subsection (b-5). The rules shall outline the essential 26elements of each form used in the implementation and   HB4966- 16 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1enforcement of the provisions of this amendatory Act of the 2103rd General Assembly. 3    No later than July 1, 2025, relative caregiver payments 4shall be made to relative caregiver homes as provided under 5Section 5 of this Act. A relative with whom a child is placed 6pursuant to this subsection may, but is not required to, apply 7for licensure as a foster family home pursuant to the Child 8Care Act of 1969; provided, however, that as of July 1, 1995, 9foster care payments shall be made only to licensed foster 10family homes pursuant to the terms of Section 5 of this Act. 11    The provisions added to this subsection (b) by Public Act 1298-846 shall become operative on and after June 1, 2015. 13    (c) In placing a child under this Act, the Department 14shall ensure that the child's health, safety, and best 15interests are met. This includes children placed outside of 16the State of Illinois by the Department as required under 17Sections 7.29, 7.30, and 7.31. In rejecting placement of a 18child with an identified relative, the Department shall (i) 19ensure that the child's health, safety, and best interests are 20met, (ii) inform the identified relative of the relative's 21right to reconsideration of the decision and provide the 22identified relative with a description of the reconsideration 23process established in accordance with subsection (o) of 24Section 5 of this Act, (iii) report that the Department 25rejected the relative placement to the court in accordance 26with the requirements of Section 2-27.3 of the Juvenile Court   HB4966- 17 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1Act of 1987, and (iv) report the reason for denial in 2accordance with Section 46 of this Act. In evaluating the best 3interests of the child, the Department shall take into 4consideration the factors set forth in subsection (4.05) of 5Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 6    The Department shall consider the individual needs of the 7child and the capacity of the prospective caregivers or 8prospective adoptive parents to meet the needs of the child. 9When a child must be placed outside the child's home and cannot 10be immediately returned to the child's parents or guardian, a 11comprehensive, individualized assessment shall be performed of 12that child at which time the needs of the child shall be 13determined. The Department shall place the child based on the 14Department's assessment of the prospective caregivers' or 15prospective adoptive parents' ability to meet the child's 16specific needs for safety, supportive care, and well-being and 17the expressed commitment of the prospective caregivers or 18adoptive parents to comply with the requirements of the 19Illinois Human Rights Act and Sections 6a, 7, 7.29, 7.30, and 207.31 of this Act. The Department shall not place a child 21without determining that the prospective caregivers or 22prospective adoptive parents have the capacity to meet the 23child's specific needs for safety, supportive care, and 24well-being, and the prospective caregivers or adoptive parents 25expressly committing to comply with the requirements of the 26Illinois Human Rights Act, the caregivers' or adoptive   HB4966- 18 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1parents' case plan obligations required under subsection (a-5) 2of Section 6a of this Act, and the requirements of Sections 7, 37.29, 7.30, and 7.31 of this Act. Only if race, color, gender, 4identity, sex, sexual orientation, or national origin is 5identified as a legitimate factor in advancing the child's 6best interests shall it be considered. Placement decisions 7shall not be made in a manner that violates a child's right to 8be free from unlawful discrimination as protected under the 9Illinois Human Rights Act. Race, color, or national origin 10shall not be routinely considered in making a placement 11decision. The Department shall make special efforts for the 12diligent recruitment of potential foster and adoptive families 13that reflect the ethnic and racial diversity of the children 14for whom foster and adoptive homes are needed. "Special 15efforts" shall include contacting and working with community 16organizations and religious organizations and may include 17contracting with those organizations, utilizing local media 18and other local resources, and conducting outreach activities.19    This subsection (c) applies to all interstate placements 20of a child, whether made in accordance with the Interstate 21Compact on the Placement of Children, an intergovernmental 22agreement, or any other placement arrangement authorized by 23the Department to provide substitute care. This does not 24include out-of-state placements with a parent.25    Nothing in this subsection (c) shall be construed to limit 26or diminish: (i) the rights of a child to be free from   HB4966- 19 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1discrimination or to receive care consistent with the 2protections guaranteed under State and federal law or (ii) the 3Department's obligation to act in the best interests of a 4child. 5    (c-1) At the time of placement, the Department shall 6consider concurrent planning, as described in subsection (l-1) 7of Section 5, so that permanency may occur at the earliest 8opportunity. Consideration should be given so that if 9reunification fails or is delayed, the placement made is the 10best available placement to provide permanency for the child. 11To the extent that doing so is in the child's best interests as 12set forth in subsection (4.05) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile 13Court Act of 1987, the Department should consider placements 14that will permit the child to maintain a meaningful 15relationship with the child's parents. 16    (d) The Department may accept gifts, grants, offers of 17services, and other contributions to use in making special 18recruitment efforts.19    (e) The Department in placing children in relative 20caregiver, certified relative caregiver, adoptive, or foster 21care homes may not, in any policy or practice relating to the 22placement of children for adoption or foster care, 23discriminate against any child or prospective caregiver or 24adoptive parent on the basis of race.25(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-1061, eff. 7-1-25.)   HB4966- 20 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    (20 ILCS 505/7.29 new)2    Sec. 7.29. Caregiver conduct supporting youth well-being 3and protected characteristics.4    (a) Legislative purpose. It is the policy of this State 5that youth in the care or custody of the Department are 6entitled to safety, dignity, stability, mental health, and 7emotional well-being, including, but not limited to, respect 8for the youth's protected characteristics, and that caregiver 9conduct and placement conditions directly affect permanency, 10well-being, and best interests.11    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section:12    "Protected characteristic" means any characteristic 13protected under the Illinois Human Rights Act, including, but 14not limited to, actual or perceived race, color, religion, 15sex, sexual orientation, gender-related identity, national 16origin, ancestry, age, disability, pregnancy, reproductive 17health decisions, or marital status.18    "Supportive care" means caregiving practices that are 19supportive of and responsive to a youth's identity, lived 20experience, and developmental needs and that do not subject 21the youth to rejection or hostility based on, or coercive 22efforts to change, a protected characteristic.23    "Youth" has the meaning ascribed to that term in 24subsection (b) of Section 4e of this Act.25    (c) Applicability. This Section applies to all caregivers, 26foster homes, relative placements, and licensed child care   HB4966- 21 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1facilities providing care to youth in the care or custody of 2the Department.3    (d) Placement and caregiver conduct requirements. A foster 4parent, relative caregiver, group home, residential treatment 5center, child care institution, or child placing agency 6providing care to a youth shall:7        (1) provide care in a manner that is respectful of and 8    supportive of the youth's individual identity, needs, and 9    protected characteristics as defined under the Illinois 10    Human Rights Act, and consistent with the youth's case 11    plan and best interests; and12        (2) cooperate with the Department in supporting 13    services, care planning, and placements that are 14    consistent with the youth's health, safety, well-being, 15    and best interests.16    (e) Prohibited conduct. A foster parent, relative 17caregiver, group home, residential treatment center, child 18care institution, or child placing agency providing care to a 19youth in the care or custody of the Department is prohibited 20from engaging in conduct that:21        (1) demeans, harasses, rejects, intentionally 22    disregards, or retaliates against a youth based on a 23    protected characteristic;24        (2) intentionally interferes with services, supports, 25    or treatment identified in the youth's case plan; or26        (3) subjects a youth to practices prohibited under   HB4966- 22 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    subsection (f) of Section 7.30 of this Act.2    (f) Scope and limitations. Nothing in this Section shall 3be construed to:4        (1) regulate or compel an individual's beliefs, 5    religious practices, or private speech unrelated to the 6    provision of care;7        (2) require a caregiver to provide medical treatment 8    beyond that authorized by law, court order, parental 9    consent, or Department policy; or10        (3) prohibit reasonable and developmentally 11    appropriate limits necessary to protect the safety of the 12    youth or others.13    (g) Clinical judgment and safety exception. Actions taken 14in accordance with the good-faith exercise of clinical 15judgment by a licensed professional, or actions necessary to 16address immediate safety concerns, shall not constitute a 17violation of this Section, provided that such actions are not 18based on bias against a protected characteristic and are 19documented in the youth's case record.20    (h) Licensure and contract conditions. Compliance with 21this Section is a condition of licensure, approval, and 22continued eligibility to provide care under this Act and a 23condition of any contract, grant, or purchase-of-service 24agreement with the Department.25    (i) Enforcement. Violations of this Section may result in 26corrective action, removal of a child, enhanced monitoring,   HB4966- 23 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1placement holds, or other remedies authorized by law.2    (j) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit or 3diminish: (i) the rights of a youth to be free from 4discrimination or to receive care consistent with the 5protections guaranteed under State and federal law; or (ii) 6the Department's obligation to act in the youth's best 7interests. 8    (20 ILCS 505/7.30 new)9    Sec. 7.30. Protection of access to lawful health care for 10youth placed outside the State of Illinois. 11    (a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:12        (1) Youth in the care or custody of the Department 13    remain subject to the jurisdiction of Illinois courts 14    regardless of placement location, and access to medically 15    appropriate health care is essential to youth safety and 16    well-being.17        (2) Denial or delay of medically appropriate health 18    care may result in serious physical and mental health 19    consequences.20        (3) The Department has a continuing obligation to act 21    in the best interests of youth in its care, including 22    ensuring access to lawful, medically appropriate health 23    care authorized under Illinois law.24        (4) It is the policy of this State to ensure that all 25    youth in the care, custody, or guardianship of the   HB4966- 24 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    Department of Children and Family Services receive the 2    full measure of protections, rights, and services 3    guaranteed under Illinois law, regardless of the state in 4    which the Department places a youth, and the General 5    Assembly intends to protect the rights of youth placed by 6    the Department outside the physical boundaries of the 7    State of Illinois and require the Department to take 8    affirmative steps to protect youth residing outside the 9    State of Illinois when they are under the jurisdiction of 10    the juvenile court under Article II proceedings of the 11    Juvenile Court Act of 1987.12    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section:13    "Adverse action" means a loss of a statutory protection 14available under Illinois law that would otherwise be available 15to a youth if not for the placement of a youth outside the 16physical boundaries of the State of Illinois that can be 17reasonably predicted to have the effect of one or more of the 18following: exposing a youth or a youth's caregiver to criminal 19prosecution under the laws of another state related to the 20youth procuring or receiving health care, including mental 21health care, that is lawful in the State of Illinois; 22depriving a youth of access to health care, including mental 23health care, that is lawful in the State of Illinois; 24subjecting a youth to mental health care in another state that 25involves "sexual orientation change efforts" or "conversion 26therapy" as the terms are defined under Section 15 of the Youth   HB4966- 25 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1Mental Health Protection Act; denying youth the authority to 2consent to health care that they would otherwise be permitted 3to consent to if the youth were in the State of Illinois; or 4depriving youth of the ability to maintain the privacy of 5their health care records that they would otherwise be 6permitted to deny a parent's or guardian's access to if the 7youth were participating in health care services in Illinois.8    "Coordination of lawful health care" means activities 9related to arranging, referring, facilitating access to, 10monitoring, or advocating for health care services, including 11mental health care, that is lawful in the State of Illinois. 12This includes communications necessary to effectuate such 13services, for youth placed outside the State of Illinois.14    "Interstate placement" means the placement of a youth for 15whom Illinois retains legal custody or guardianship in a 16relative home, foster home, residential facility, or other 17placement located outside this State, including placements 18made pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of 19Children. This does not apply to out-of-state placement of a 20minor in the home of a parent.21    "Youth" has the meaning ascribed to that term in 22subsection (b) of Section 4e of this Act.23    (c) Retention of consent authority. For any youth in the 24care or custody of the Department, the Department retains 25authority to consent to and authorize health care consistent 26with Illinois law, unless otherwise ordered by a court of   HB4966- 26 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1competent jurisdiction, regardless of the youth's physical 2location.3    (d) Individualized placement assessment for out-of-state 4placements.5        (1) Prior to placing a youth age 8 or older outside the 6    State of Illinois, the Department shall conduct an 7    individualized assessment of the suitability and risks of 8    the proposed placement for the specific youth. The 9    Department shall monitor and continue to reassess 10    suitability and risks as required by this Section if the 11    youth is placed out-of-state. If a youth is placed 12    out-of-state before turning age 8, the Department shall 13    commence the initial assessment within 30 days of the 14    youth achieving age 8 and begin monitoring and 15    reassessment of suitability and risks under this Section 16    while the youth remains in out-of-state placement. 17    Assessments required under this Section shall consider, as 18    appropriate:19            (A) the youth's age, development, and expressed 20        preferences;21            (B) the youth's physical, mental, reproductive, 22        and sexual health needs, including reasonably 23        foreseeable needs that may arise during the placement;24            (C) whether the laws of the placement jurisdiction 25        may limit or interfere with access to care or services 26        that would be lawful under Illinois law, including,   HB4966- 27 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        but not limited to, reproductive health care as 2        defined in Section 1-10 of the Reproductive Health 3        Act, lawful health care as defined in Section 28-10 of 4        the Lawful Health Care Activity Act, a youth's 5        authority to consent to care under Sections 1, 3, 4, 6        and 5 of the Consent by Minors to Health Care Services 7        Act, the privacy protections afforded to minors under 8        the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 9        Confidentiality Act, birth control services and 10        information available to minors under the Birth 11        Control Services to Minors Act, and the ability of 12        youth to request and receive outpatient counseling 13        services and psychotherapy under the Mental Health and 14        Developmental Disabilities Code;15            (D) the youth's vulnerability to discrimination, 16        retaliation, or harm based on the youth's protected 17        characteristics or other individualized factors; and18            (E) the Department's plan to monitor and reassess 19        the suitability and risks associated with the 20        placement to ensure mitigation of risk is sufficient 21        to meet the youth's needs, which may include plans to 22        arrange equivalent protections or access to relevant 23        health care through contractual obligations and 24        supplemental services or by ensuring the youth's safe 25        return to the State of Illinois to access relevant 26        care.  HB4966- 28 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        The Department shall document the assessment in the 2    youth's case record, including the basis for the 3    placement, the assessment of protections available, and 4    the specific actions taken or to be taken, including 5    protective measures to mitigate against adverse action and 6    report this information to the court as required under 7    Sections 2-27.2, 2-27.4, and 2-28 of the Juvenile Court 8    Act. If the Department places the youth age 8 or older 9    out-of-state, the Department shall continue to report this 10    information to the court as part of the Department's 11    required efforts under Sections 2-27.2 and 2-27.4 of the 12    Juvenile Court Act of 1987. If the Department places a 13    youth under age 8 out-of-state, the Department shall begin 14    to report this information to the court as part of the 15    Department's required efforts under Sections 2-27.2 and 16    2-27.4 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 when the youth 17    achieves the age of 8.18        (2) If the initial placement assessment for a youth 19    age 8 or older finds that the placement poses risk of 20    adverse action relevant to the youth's specific 21    circumstances and that risk cannot be sufficiently and 22    effectively mitigated for this youth's circumstances, the 23    Department shall not place a youth age 8 or older unless 24    the youth expresses wishes to be placed in the receiving 25    state with a protective plan developed by the Department 26    after the youth has been sufficiently advised of the   HB4966- 29 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    diminished protections available in the receiving state 2    and the risk these diminished protections pose to the 3    youth's specific circumstances.4        If that youth is not already represented by legal 5    counsel, the Department shall notify the court of the 6    youth's need for legal counsel and request that the court 7    appoint legal counsel for the youth as required under 8    Section 2-17.5 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 to ensure 9    the youth can be sufficiently advised of the diminished 10    protections available in the receiving state and the risk 11    these diminished protections pose to the youth's specific 12    circumstances. The Department shall include the youth's 13    pre-placement assessment in the Department's request to 14    the court.15        If the youth was under age 8 at the time of 16    out-of-state placement and the initial placement 17    assessment required under this Section for youth achieving 18    the age 8 after out-of-state placement finds that the 19    placement poses risk of adverse action relevant to the 20    youth's specific circumstances and that risk cannot be 21    sufficiently and effectively mitigated for the youth's 22    circumstances, the Department shall ensure that the youth 23    wishes to remain placed in the receiving state with a 24    protective plan developed by the Department after the 25    youth has been sufficiently advised of the diminished 26    protections available in the receiving state and the risk   HB4966- 30 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    these diminished protections pose to the youth's specific 2    circumstances.3        If that youth is not already represented by legal 4    counsel, the Department shall notify the court of the 5    youth's need for legal counsel and request that the court 6    appoint legal counsel for the youth as required under 7    Section 2-17.5 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 to ensure 8    the youth can be sufficiently advised of the diminished 9    protections available in the state of the youth's 10    placement and the risk these diminished protections pose 11    to the youth's specific circumstances. The Department 12    shall include a summary of the findings of the youth's 13    initial placement assessment in the Department's request 14    to the court.15        (3) Nothing in this subsection (d) requires court 16    approval prior to placement unless otherwise required by 17    law.18    (e) Ongoing duty for Illinois-based case worker contact 19and monitoring.20        (1) For any youth age 8 or older placed outside the 21    State of Illinois, the Department shall ensure that an 22    Illinois-based caseworker maintains regular and meaningful 23    contact with the youth for the purpose of monitoring 24    safety, well-being, and access to medically appropriate 25    care. At a minimum, such contact shall include:26            (A) direct communication with the youth at   HB4966- 31 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        intervals consistent with Department policy, but not 2        less frequently than once per month in a manner that 3        permits the youth to speak freely without the undue 4        influence of others, about the youth's needs and 5        concerns related to health, safety, and well-being;6            (B) monitoring whether the youth's placement is 7        complying with the Department's plan to ensure the 8        youth is receiving care that meets or exceeds Illinois 9        standards for safety, well-being, permanency planning, 10        and health care access;11            (C) identifying emerging or reasonably foreseeable 12        health care needs, including reproductive and sexual 13        health needs, in light of the youth's age, development 14        and circumstances; and15            (D) reassessing whether the placement continues to 16        meet the youth's needs in light of changing 17        circumstances and whether mitigation efforts are 18        needed or existing efforts require modification. Case 19        worker contact required under this subsection shall be 20        documented in the case record and reported to the 21        court as required under Sections 2-27.2, 2-27.4, and 22        2-28 of the Juvenile Court Act.23        (2) The ongoing assessment and monitoring required 24    under this subsection shall recognize that a youth's 25    health care needs may change over time and shall not be 26    limited to conditions or needs identified at the time of   HB4966- 32 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    placement. The Department shall document such 2    reassessments in the youth's case file. When a youth is 3    placed in a jurisdiction with laws or practices that 4    present risk of adverse action and may materially restrict 5    access to health care that would be lawful and medically 6    appropriate under Illinois law, the Department shall 7    consider whether continued placement remains in the best 8    interests of the youth.9        (3) If the Department's ongoing monitoring and 10    assessment required under this subsection finds that the 11    risk of adverse action relevant to the youth's specific 12    circumstances can no longer be sufficiently and 13    effectively mitigated while the youth remains 14    out-of-state, as required under paragraph (1), the 15    Department shall intervene or recall the youth to Illinois 16    unless the youth expresses wishes to remain in the 17    receiving state with a protective plan, after the youth 18    has been sufficiently advised of the diminished 19    protections available to the youth in that placement and 20    the risk these diminished protections pose to the youth's 21    specific circumstances. The Department shall immediately 22    notify the youth's legal counsel when the Department is 23    considering intervening or recalling the youth as provided 24    under this paragraph.25        If an out-of-state placement results in the denial, 26    delay, or material interference with authorized health   HB4966- 33 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    care approved by the Department, ordered by an Illinois 2    court, or consented to by the youth as permitted by laws 3    allowing minors to consent, the Department shall initiate 4    prompt action to secure access to care or an alternative 5    placement and notify the youth's legal counsel.6        (4) If the youth's circumstances did not require 7    appointment of legal counsel under paragraph (2) of 8    subsection (d) prior to out-of-state placement, but the 9    youth's current circumstances have changed such that 10    appointment of legal counsel is now required under 11    paragraph (2) of subsection (d) or under this subsection, 12    and the youth is not otherwise represented by legal 13    counsel, the Department shall notify the court of the 14    youth's need for legal counsel and request that the court 15    appoint legal counsel for the youth under Section 2-17.5 16    of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.17    (f) Prohibition on consent to conversion therapy. 18Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department 19shall not consent, authorize, or otherwise arrange for a youth 20to receive mental health services that involve "sexual 21orientation change efforts" or "conversion therapy" as those 22terms are defined under Section 15 of the Youth Mental Health 23Protection Act, regardless of whether the child is placed 24within or outside of this State.25    Nothing in this subsection prohibits a youth from 26receiving voluntary counseling that does not seek to change   HB4966- 34 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1sexual orientation or gender identity, nor does it limit the 2authority of a court of competent jurisdiction to issue orders 3necessary to protect the health or safety of the youth.4    (g) Protection of Department employees and agents. No 5employee or agent of the Department shall be subject to 6discipline, retaliation, adverse employment action, civil 7liability, or criminal liability solely for the coordination 8of lawful health care for a youth in an interstate placement, 9when such coordination is undertaken in good faith and within 10the scope of the employee's or agent's official duties in 11accordance with Sections 6a, 7, 7.29, 7.30, and 7.31 of this 12Act.13    The Department, and any employee or agent thereof, shall 14not knowingly cooperate with or provide assistance to any 15out-of-state investigation, enforcement action, subpoena, or 16request that seeks to impose civil, criminal, or professional 17penalties on a Department employee or agent based solely on 18the coordination of lawful health care, as defined in this 19Section.20    The State shall provide legal defense and indemnification 21to an employee or agent of the Department for any claim, 22action, or proceeding arising solely from the good-faith 23coordination of lawful health care for a youth in an 24interstate placement.25    For purposes of any civil claim arising from conduct 26described in this subsection, Illinois law shall govern the   HB4966- 35 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1duties and obligations of the Department employee, contractor, 2or agent.3    (h) Construction. Nothing in this Section shall be 4construed to:5        (1) provide immunity for any act or omission unrelated 6    to the coordination of lawful health care;7        (2) require any person or entity to violate the laws 8    of another state;9        (3) authorize conduct that is not otherwise lawful 10    under Illinois law;11        (4) regulate the practice of medicine in another 12    state;13        (5) limit the authority of Illinois courts over youth 14    for whom the Department retains legal custody;15        (6) require another state to permit or provide health 16    care services; or17        (7) protect conduct that constitutes willful 18    misconduct or gross negligence under Illinois law.19    (i) Applicability. This Section applies to placements made 20directly by the Department and to placements arranged in 21accordance with the Interstate Compact on the Placement of 22Children.23    (j) Enforcement. Failure to comply with this Section 24constitutes grounds for placement denial, placement 25termination, or other remedial action authorized by law.26    (k) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit or   HB4966- 36 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1diminish: (i) the rights of a youth to be free from 2discrimination or to receive care consistent with the 3protections guaranteed under State and federal law or (ii) the 4Department's obligation to act in the youth's best interests. 5    (20 ILCS 505/7.31 new)6    Sec. 7.31. Youth-directed placement decision-making.7    (a) Youth right to express placement preference. A youth 8age 8 or older in the care or custody of the Department has the 9right to express a placement preference, including a 10preference for an out-of-state placement, and to have that 11preference treated as a primary consideration in placement 12decisions.13    (b) Presumption in favor of youth preference. There shall 14be a rebuttable presumption that a placement consistent with 15the youth's expressed preference is in the youth's best 16interests.17    (c) Burden on the Department. The Department may decline 18or override a placement requested by the youth only if the 19Department demonstrates, by clear and convincing evidence, 20that the placement would pose a specific and imminent risk of 21serious harm to the youth that cannot be reasonably mitigated 22through supports, services, planning, or placement conditions.23    (d) Required findings. Any decision to deny a youth's 24placement preference shall be:25        (1) made in writing in an age-appropriate and   HB4966- 37 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    developmentally appropriate manner;2        (2) supported by individualized findings specific to 3    the youth and the requested placement; and4        (3) descriptive of the efforts made to mitigate 5    identified risks.6    (e) Legal counsel and advocacy. If the youth is appointed 7legal counsel, a youth asserting a placement preference under 8this Section has the right to consult with legal counsel prior 9to a final placement decision.10    (f) Notice of rights. The Department shall provide written 11and verbal notice of the rights under this Section to youth in 12an age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate manner and 13shall document provision of the notice in the youth's case 14file. 15    (20 ILCS 505/7.32 new)16    Sec. 7.32. Public transparency and accountability 17reporting.18    (a) Beginning January 1, 2028, and annually every January 191 thereafter, the Department shall post on its website data 20from the preceding State fiscal year regarding:21        (1) The following information for each youth placed 22    out-of-state: age, gender, type of placement (relative, 23    foster home, adoptive home, institution, detention, or any 24    other type of placement), and the name of the state in 25    which the youth is placed.  HB4966- 38 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        (2) The number of violations in which the Department 2    took action pertaining to Sections 6a, 7, 7.29, 7.30, and 3    7.31 of this Act. For data related to each violation, the 4    Department shall indicate the type of action taken by the 5    Department and the outcome associated with each violation.6        (3) A list of contracted entities that had repeat 7    findings of violations under Sections 6a, 7, 7.29, 7.30, 8    and 7.31 of this Act or under Section 8.1b of the Child 9    Care Act of 1969.10        (4) The number of youth appointed legal counsel for 11    purposes of subsections (d) and (e) of Section 7.30.12    The Department shall include a description of the 13methodology the Department used to collect the information for 14paragraphs (1) through (4), indicate whether the Department 15had any difficulties collecting the information, and indicate 16whether there are concerns about the validity of the 17information. If any of the data elements required to be 18disclosed under this Section could reveal a youth's identity 19if revealed in combination with all the identifying 20information due to small sample size, the Department shall 21exclude the data elements that could be used to identify the 22youth so that the data can be included as part of a larger 23sample and report that the data was excluded for this reason.24    (b) Performance audits. Three years after the effective 25date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 26Auditor General shall commence a performance audit of the   HB4966- 39 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1Department to determine whether the Department is meeting the 2requirements established by this amendatory Act of the 104th 3General Assembly in Sections 6a, 7, 7.29, 7.30, 7.31, and 7.32 4of this Act, Section 8.1b of the Child Care Act of 1969, and 5Sections 2-17.5, 2-27.2, 2-27.4, and 2-28 of the Juvenile 6Court Act of 1987. Within 3 years after the audit's release, 7the Auditor General shall commence a follow-up performance 8audit to determine whether the Department has implemented the 9recommendations contained in the initial performance audit.10    Upon completion of each audit, the Auditor General shall 11report its findings to the General Assembly. The Auditor 12General's reports shall include any issues or deficiencies and 13recommendations. The audits required by this Section shall be 14in accordance with and subject to the Illinois State Auditing 15Act. The Department shall post both audits required under this 16subsection on the Department's website within 30 days after 17the Auditor General's finalization of the respective audit. 18    (20 ILCS 505/7.33 new)19    Sec. 7.33. Private right of action.20    (a) Any child or youth aggrieved by a violation of 21subsection (a-5) of Section 6a, subsection (c) of Section 7, 22or Sections 7.29, 7.30, or 7.31 may bring a civil action in a 23court of competent jurisdiction.24    (b) An action under this Section may be brought without 25exhaustion of administrative remedies available through the   HB4966- 40 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1Department of Children and Family Services.2    (c) Relief under this Section may include:3        (1) injunctive and declaratory relief, including 4    orders requiring compliance with this Act;5        (2) actual damages, including damages for emotional 6    distress, where proven;7        (3) reasonable attorney's fees and costs; and8        (4) any other relief the court deems appropriate.9    The remedies provided in this Section are in addition to 10any other remedies available at law or in equity.11    (d) This Section is in addition to and does not limit any 12enforcement authority of the Department of Children and Family 13Services.14    (e) If any provision of this Section or its application to 15any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity 16does not affect other provisions or applications of this 17Section that can be given effect without the invalid provision 18or application. 19    Section 10. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by adding 20Section 8.1b as follows: 21    (225 ILCS 10/8.1b new)22    Sec. 8.1b. Supportive care for youth in care; 23youth-directed placement rights; licensure and contractual 24compliance.  HB4966- 41 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    (a) Any child care facility, child care institution, group 2home, residential treatment center, or child placing agency 3licensed under this Act that serves a child in the care or 4custody of the Department of Children and Family Services 5shall comply with Sections 6a, 7, 7.29, 7.30, and 7.31 of the 6Children and Family Services Act. As a condition of licensure 7under this Act and of eligibility to contract with or receive 8placement referrals from the Department of Children and Family 9Services, an entity licensed under this Act that provides care 10to a child in the care or custody of the Department shall 11comply with Sections 6a, 7, 7.29, 7.30, and 7.31 of the 12Children and Family Services Act and agree, by contract or 13written agreement, to comply with those Sections.14    (b) Cooperation with youth-directed placement decisions. A 15licensed entity and its employees, agents, and caregivers 16shall cooperate with placement decisions and processes arising 17under Section 7.31 of the Children and Family Services Act, 18including by:19        (1) allowing youth to communicate placement 20    preferences without retaliation or interference;21        (2) cooperating with assessments, planning, and court 22    review related to youth-directed placement requests; and23        (3) not obstructing lawful placement transitions 24    approved by the Department or ordered by a court.25    (c) Youth notice obligation. Licensed entities shall 26ensure that youth in their care receive the notice of rights   HB4966- 42 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1required under Section 7.31 of the Children and Family 2Services Act and shall cooperate with the Department in 3documenting delivery of such notice.4    (d) Cooperation with health care determinations for 5Illinois youth. An entity licensed under this Act that 6provides care to a child in the care or custody of the 7Department of Children and Family Services, including a child 8placed outside the State in accordance with the Interstate 9Compact on the Placement of Children, shall cooperate with 10health care determinations and care plans authorized under 11Illinois law, approved by the Department or an Illinois court, 12or consented to by the child if the child has statutory 13authority to provide such consent.14    (e) Enforcement. Failure to comply with this Section 15constitutes grounds for corrective action, contract 16noncompliance, placement suspension or termination, or 17licensure suspension, revocation, or modification of a license 18issued under this Act as authorized by law.19    (f) Private right of action. Any child or youth aggrieved 20by a violation of this Section may bring a civil action in a 21court of competent jurisdiction against the licensed entity 22responsible for the violation.23    Relief under this subsection may include injunctive or 24declaratory relief, actual damages, statutory damages, 25reasonable attorney's fees, and costs.26    An action under this subsection may be brought without   HB4966- 43 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1exhaustion of administrative remedies available through the 2Department of Children and Family Services.3    This subsection is in addition to and does not limit any 4enforcement authority of the Department of Children and Family 5Services.6    (g) If any provision of this Section or its application is 7held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions 8or applications of this Section. 9    Section 15. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 10changing Sections 2-27.2 and 2-28 and by adding Sections 112-17.5 and 2-27.4 as follows: 12    (705 ILCS 405/2-17.5 new)13    Sec. 2-17.5. Appointment of attorney for youth in care 14with special needs.15    (a) As used in this Section, "youth" has the meaning 16ascribed to that term in subsection (b) of Section 4e of the 17Children and Family Services Act. The term does not require 18that a youth be adjudicated dependent for purposes of this 19Section.20    (b) Unless a youth is already represented by an attorney 21in these proceedings, an attorney shall be appointed for a 22youth in accordance with subsection (e) or (f) of Section 7.30 23of the Children and Family Services Act.24    (c) The court shall appoint an attorney upon notice to the   HB4966- 44 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1court that a youth requires counsel under subsection (e) or 2(f) of Section 7.30 of the Children and Family Services Act.3    (d) The Department shall develop procedures to identify a 4youth in care who has a special need specified under 5subsection (b) and to request that a court appoint an attorney 6for the youth as required under subsection (e) or (f) of 7Section 7.30 of the Children and Family Services Act.8    (e) This Section does not limit the authority of the court 9to appoint an attorney for a minor or a guardian ad litem in a 10proceeding under this Act.  11    (705 ILCS 405/2-27.2)12    Sec. 2-27.2. Placement; out-of-state residential treatment 13center.14    (a) In addition to the provisions of subsection (3) of 15Section 2-27 of this Act, no placement by any probation 16officer or agency whose representative is an appointed 17guardian of the person or legal custodian of the minor may be 18made in an out-of-state residential treatment center unless 19the court has determined that the out-of-state residential 20placement is in the best interest and is the least 21restrictive, most family-like setting for the minor. The 22Department's application to the court to place a minor in an 23out-of-state residential treatment center shall include:24        (1) an explanation of what in State resources, if any, 25    were considered for the minor and why the minor cannot be   HB4966- 45 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    placed in a residential treatment center or other 2    placement in this State;3        (2) an explanation as to how the out-of-state 4    residential treatment center will impact the minor's 5    relationships with family and other individuals important 6    to the minor in and what steps the Department will take to 7    preserve those relationships;8        (3) an explanation as to how the Department will 9    ensure the safety and well-being of the minor in the 10    out-of-state residential treatment center, which shall 11    include the Department's attestation that the placement 12    has agreed to abide by the caregiver conduct required 13    under Section 6a and subsections (d) and (e) of Section 14    7.29 of the Children and Family Services Act; and15        (4) an explanation as to why it is in the minor's best 16    interest to be placed in an out-of-state residential 17    treatment center, including a description of the minor's 18    treatment needs and how those needs will be met in the 19    proposed placement; .20        (5) if the minor is 8 years of age or older, an 21    explanation of the individual placement assessment 22    required under paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 23    7.30 of the Children and Family Services Act, including 24    any risk of adverse action and the Department's plan to 25    mitigate such risk; and26        (6) if applicable to the minor's circumstances, a   HB4966- 46 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    notification to the court requesting that the court 2    appoint legal counsel for the minor as required under 3    subsection (b) of Section 2-17.5 of this Act. 4    (b) If the out-of-state residential treatment center is a 5secure facility as defined in paragraph (18) of Section 1-3 of 6this Act, the requirements of Section 27.1 of this Act shall 7also be met prior to the minor's placement in the out-of-state 8residential treatment center.9    (b-5) If the minor is age 8 or older and the selection of 10the out-of-state residential treatment center is in conflict 11with the minor's placement preference under subsection (a) of 12Section 7.31 of the Children and Family Services Act, an 13explanation of the Department's findings required to meet the 14Department's burden under subsection (c) of Section 7.31 of 15the Children and Family Services Act shall also be met prior to 16the minor's placement in the out-of-state residential 17treatment center. The court shall put in writing the factual 18basis supporting its determination that the Department has or 19has not met the burden or made the findings required under 20subsections (c) and (d) of Section 7.31 of the Children and 21Family Services Act, and shall enter specific findings based 22on evidence. 23    (c) This Section does not apply to an out-of-state 24placement of a minor in a family foster home, relative foster 25home, a home of a parent, or a dormitory or independent living 26setting of a minor attending a post-secondary educational   HB4966- 47 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1institution.2(Source: P.A. 100-136, eff. 8-18-17.) 3    (705 ILCS 405/2-27.4 new)4    Sec. 2-27.4. Assessment and monitoring for minors in 5out-of-state placements.6    (a) Applicability. Prior to initiating or approving an 7out-of-state placement of a minor under the care or custody of 8the Department of Children and Family Services, including 9placements in accordance with the Interstate Compact on the 10Placement of Children, the Department shall conduct an 11individualized pre-placement assessment addressing the 12suitability and risks of the proposed placement for the 13specific minor. This applies to minors age 8 or older. This 14does not include minors being placed with parents or minors 15being placed in an out-of-state residential treatment center. 16Minors being placed in an out-of-state residential treatment 17center shall be reviewed under Section 2-27.2.18    (b) Court notification. No later than 5 days prior to the 19out-of-state placement of a minor 8 years or age or older, the 20public agency that is the custodian or guardian of the minor 21shall file a written report with the court explaining:22        (1) The assessment completed under subsection (d) of 23    Section 7.30 of the Children and Family Services Act, 24    including identification of any known or reasonably 25    foreseeable risks to the minor's health, safety, or   HB4966- 48 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    well-being arising from the laws, policies, or practices 2    of the placement jurisdiction;3        (2) the necessity and justification for the 4    out-of-state placement;5        (3) the Department's efforts to identify an in-state 6    placement;7        (4) the anticipated duration of the placement, if this 8    placement is not with a relative, as defined under the 9    Children and Family Services Act;10        (5) the plan of the public agency that is the 11    custodian or guardian of the minor for maintaining regular 12    and meaningful contact between the Illinois-based assigned 13    caseworker and the minor as required under subsections (d) 14    and (e) of Section 7.30 of the Children and Family 15    Services Act;16        (6) the minor's expressed preferences regarding the 17    placement, and for youth age 8 or older, the Department's 18    consideration of this preference in accordance with 19    subsections (d) and (e) of Section 7.31 of the Children 20    and Family Services Act; and21        (7) if the minor's circumstances necessitate such 22    appointment under subsection (d) or (e) of Section 7.30 of 23    the Children and Family Services Act, a request that the 24    court appoint legal counsel for the minor as required 25    under Section 2-17.5 of this Act.26    If paragraph (7) necessitates, the court shall appoint   HB4966- 49 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1legal counsel for the minor under Section 2-17.5 if the court 2determines that such appointment is required under subsection 3(d) or (e) of Section 7.30 of the Children and Family Services 4Act.5    (c) Presumption triggering court review. Upon motion of 6the minor, the minor's attorney, the guardian ad litem, or the 7Department, the court shall conduct a review of the 8out-of-state placement if there is reason to believe that:9        (1) the minor's health care needs are at serious risk 10    of not being met by this placement;11        (2) the minor will not be able to reasonably access 12    care that would be lawful and medically appropriate under 13    Illinois law and there are not sufficient protective 14    measures to mitigate these circumstances, as required 15    under Section 7.30; or16        (3) the public agency that is custodian or guardian of 17    the minor has failed to comply with the requirements of 18    Section 7.30 or 7.31.19    (d) Upon review under this Section, the court shall find 20that the public agency that is custodian or guardian of the 21minor met or failed to meet the burden required under 22subsection (c) of Section 7.31 of the Children and Family 23Services Act. The court shall put in writing the factual basis 24supporting its determination and enter specific findings based 25on evidence.   HB4966- 50 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    (705 ILCS 405/2-28)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-107)3    Sec. 2-28. Court review. 4    (1) The court may require any legal custodian or guardian 5of the person appointed under this Act to report periodically 6to the court or may cite the legal custodian or guardian into 7court and require the legal custodian, guardian, or the legal 8custodian's or guardian's agency to make a full and accurate 9report of the doings of the legal custodian, guardian, or 10agency on behalf of the minor. The custodian or guardian, 11within 10 days after such citation, or earlier if the court 12determines it to be necessary to protect the health, safety, 13or welfare of the minor, shall make the report, either in 14writing verified by affidavit or orally under oath in open 15court, or otherwise as the court directs. Upon the hearing of 16the report the court may remove the custodian or guardian and 17appoint another in the custodian's or guardian's stead or 18restore the minor to the custody of the minor's parents or 19former guardian or custodian. However, custody of the minor 20shall not be restored to any parent, guardian, or legal 21custodian in any case in which the minor is found to be 22neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent under 23Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared for at 24home without endangering the minor's health or safety and it 25is in the best interests of the minor, and if such neglect, 26abuse, or dependency is found by the court under paragraph (1)   HB4966- 51 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about due to the acts 2or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, or legal 3custodian, until such time as an investigation is made as 4provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the issue of 5the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to 6care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 7parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the 8minor.9    (1.5) The public agency that is the custodian or guardian 10of the minor shall file a written report with the court no 11later than 15 days after a minor in the agency's care remains:12        (1) in a shelter placement beyond 30 days;13        (2) in a psychiatric hospital past the time when the 14    minor is clinically ready for discharge or beyond medical 15    necessity for the minor's health; or16        (3) in a detention center or Department of Juvenile 17    Justice facility solely because the public agency cannot 18    find an appropriate placement for the minor.19    The report shall explain the steps the agency is taking to 20ensure the minor is placed appropriately, how the minor's 21needs are being met in the minor's shelter placement, and if a 22future placement has been identified by the Department, why 23the anticipated placement is appropriate for the needs of the 24minor and the anticipated placement date. 25    (1.6) Within 30 days after placing a child in its care in a 26qualified residential treatment program, as defined by the   HB4966- 52 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1federal Social Security Act, the Department of Children and 2Family Services shall prepare a written report for filing with 3the court and send copies of the report to all parties. Within 420 days of the filing of the report, or as soon thereafter as 5the court's schedule allows but not more than 60 days from the 6date of placement, the court shall hold a hearing to consider 7the Department's report and determine whether placement of the 8child in a qualified residential treatment program provides 9the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child 10in the least restrictive environment and if the placement is 11consistent with the short-term and long-term goals for the 12child, as specified in the permanency plan for the child. The 13court shall approve or disapprove the placement. If 14applicable, the requirements of Sections 2-27.1 and 2-27.2 of 15this Act and Sections 7.30 and 7.31 of the Children and Family 16Services Act must also be met. The Department's written report 17and the court's written determination shall be included in and 18made part of the case plan for the child. If the child remains 19placed in a qualified residential treatment program, the 20Department shall submit evidence at each status and permanency 21hearing: 22        (A) demonstrating that ongoing on-going assessment of 23    the strengths and needs of the child continues to support 24    the determination that the child's needs cannot be met 25    through placement in a foster family home, that the 26    placement provides the most effective and appropriate   HB4966- 53 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    level of care for the child in the least restrictive, 2    appropriate environment, and that the placement is 3    consistent with the short-term and long-term permanency 4    goal for the child, as specified in the permanency plan 5    for the child; 6        (B) documenting the specific treatment or service 7    needs that should be met for the child in the placement and 8    the length of time the child is expected to need the 9    treatment or services; 10        (C) the efforts made by the agency to prepare the 11    child to return home or to be placed with a fit and willing 12    relative, a legal guardian, or an adoptive parent, or in a 13    foster family home; and 14        (D) beginning July 1, 2025, documenting the 15    Department's efforts regarding ongoing family finding and 16    relative engagement required under Section 2-27.3; and . 17        (F) if applicable, the efforts made by the public 18    agency that is guardian or custodian of the minor to 19    monitor and mitigate the risk of adverse action, as 20    defined in subsection (b) of Section 7.30, relevant to the 21    child's circumstances in an out-of-state placement. 22    (2) The first permanency hearing shall be conducted by the 23judge. Subsequent permanency hearings may be heard by a judge 24or by hearing officers appointed or approved by the court in 25the manner set forth in Section 2-28.1 of this Act. The initial 26hearing shall be held (a) within 12 months from the date   HB4966- 54 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1temporary custody was taken, regardless of whether an 2adjudication or dispositional hearing has been completed 3within that time frame, (b) if the parental rights of both 4parents have been terminated in accordance with the procedure 5described in subsection (5) of Section 2-21, within 30 days of 6the order for termination of parental rights and appointment 7of a guardian with power to consent to adoption, or (c) in 8accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2-13.1. Subsequent 9permanency hearings shall be held every 6 months or more 10frequently if necessary in the court's determination following 11the initial permanency hearing, in accordance with the 12standards set forth in this Section, until the court 13determines that the plan and goal have been achieved. Once the 14plan and goal have been achieved, if the minor remains in 15substitute care, the case shall be reviewed at least every 6 16months thereafter, subject to the provisions of this Section, 17unless the minor is placed in the guardianship of a suitable 18relative or other person and the court determines that further 19monitoring by the court does not further the health, safety, 20or best interest of the child and that this is a stable 21permanent placement. The permanency hearings must occur within 22the time frames set forth in this subsection and may not be 23delayed in anticipation of a report from any source or due to 24the agency's failure to timely file its written report (this 25written report means the one required under the next paragraph 26and does not mean the service plan also referred to in that   HB4966- 55 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1paragraph).2    The public agency that is the custodian or guardian of the 3minor, or another agency responsible for the minor's care, 4shall ensure that all parties to the permanency hearings are 5provided a copy of the most recent service plan prepared 6within the prior 6 months at least 14 days in advance of the 7hearing. If not contained in the agency's service plan, the 8agency shall also include a report setting forth the 9following:10        (A) any special physical, psychological, educational, 11    medical, emotional, or other needs of the minor or the 12    minor's family that are relevant to a permanency or 13    placement determination, and for any minor age 16 or over, 14    a written description of the programs and services that 15    will enable the minor to prepare for independent living; 16        (B) beginning July 1, 2025, a written description of 17    ongoing family finding and relative engagement efforts in 18    accordance with the requirements under Section 2-27.3 the 19    agency has undertaken since the most recent report to the 20    court to plan for the emotional and legal permanency of 21    the minor;22        (C) whether a minor is placed in a licensed child care 23    facility under a corrective plan by the Department due to 24    concerns impacting the minor's safety and well-being. The 25    report shall explain the steps the Department is taking to 26    ensure the safety and well-being of the minor and that the   HB4966- 56 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    minor's needs are met in the facility;2        (C-1) if the minor is placed outside the State of 3    Illinois in a jurisdiction in which the minor is at risk of 4    adverse action as defined in subsection (b) of Section 5    7.30 of the Children and Family Services Act based on the 6    minor's identified needs, an explanation of the adverse 7    action and efforts made by the public agency that is 8    custodian or guardian of the minor to meet its obligations 9    as under Section 7.30 of the Children and Family Services 10    Act;11        (C-2) an explanation of the minor's expressed 12    preferences regarding placement, and for youth age 8 or 13    older, whether the burden was met in consideration of this 14    preference in accordance with subsections (d) and (e) of 15    Section 7.31 of the Children and Family Services Act; and 16        (D) detail regarding what progress or lack of progress 17    the parent has made in correcting the conditions requiring 18    the child to be in care; whether the child can be returned 19    home without jeopardizing the child's health, safety, and 20    welfare, what permanency goal is recommended to be in the 21    best interests of the child, and the reasons for the 22    recommendation. If a permanency goal under paragraph (A), 23    (B), or (B-1) of subsection (2.3) have been deemed 24    inappropriate and not in the minor's best interest, the 25    report must include the following information:26            (i) confirmation that the caseworker has discussed   HB4966- 57 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        the permanency options and subsidies available for 2        guardianship and adoption with the minor's caregivers, 3        the minor's parents, as appropriate, and has discussed 4        the available permanency options with the minor in an 5        age-appropriate manner;6            (ii) confirmation that the caseworker has 7        discussed with the minor's caregivers, the minor's 8        parents, as appropriate, and the minor as 9        age-appropriate, the distinctions between guardianship 10        and adoption, including, but not limited to, that 11        guardianship does not require termination of the 12        parent's rights or the consent of the parent;13            (iii) a description of the stated preferences and 14        concerns, if any, the minor, the parent as 15        appropriate, and the caregiver expressed relating to 16        the options of guardianship and adoption, and the 17        reasons for the preferences;18            (iv) if the minor is not currently in a placement 19        that will provide permanency, identification of all 20        persons presently willing and able to provide 21        permanency to the minor through either guardianship or 22        adoption, and beginning July 1, 2025, if none are 23        available, a description of the efforts made in 24        accordance with Section 2-27.3; and25            (v) state the recommended permanency goal, why 26        that goal is recommended, and why the other potential   HB4966- 58 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        goals were not recommended. 2    The caseworker must appear and testify at the permanency 3hearing. If a permanency hearing has not previously been 4scheduled by the court, the moving party shall move for the 5setting of a permanency hearing and the entry of an order 6within the time frames set forth in this subsection.7    (2.3) At the permanency hearing, the court shall determine 8the permanency goal of the child. The court shall set one of 9the following permanency goals:10        (A) The minor will be returned home by a specific date 11    within 5 months.12        (B) The minor will be in short-term care with a 13    continued goal to return home within a period not to 14    exceed one year, where the progress of the parent or 15    parents is substantial giving particular consideration to 16    the age and individual needs of the minor.17        (B-1) The minor will be in short-term care with a 18    continued goal to return home pending a status hearing. 19    When the court finds that a parent has not made reasonable 20    efforts or reasonable progress to date, the court shall 21    identify what actions the parent and the Department must 22    take in order to justify a finding of reasonable efforts 23    or reasonable progress and shall set a status hearing to 24    be held not earlier than 9 months from the date of 25    adjudication nor later than 11 months from the date of 26    adjudication during which the parent's progress will again   HB4966- 59 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    be reviewed.2        If the court has determined that goals (A), (B), and 3    (B-1) are not appropriate and not in the minor's best 4    interest, the court may select one of the following goals: 5    (C), (D), (E), (F), (G), or (H) for the minor as 6    appropriate and based on the best interests of the minor. 7    The court shall determine the appropriate goal for the 8    minor based on best interest factors and any 9    considerations outlined in that goal. 10        (C) The guardianship of the minor shall be transferred 11    to an individual or couple on a permanent basis. Prior to 12    changing the goal to guardianship, the court shall 13    consider the following: 14            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 15        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 16        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;17            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 18        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and 19        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the 20        permanency goal;21            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 22        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 23        this familial identity;24            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 25        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 26        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of   HB4966- 60 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        the Children and Family Services Act or in a certified 2        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of 3        the Child Care Act of 1969; and4            (v) whether the parent or parents have been 5        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 6        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 7        parents have as to the permanency goal. 8        (D) The minor will be in substitute care pending court 9    determination on termination of parental rights. Prior to 10    changing the goal to substitute care pending court 11    determination on termination of parental rights, the court 12    shall consider the following: 13            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 14        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 15        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;16            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 17        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and 18        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the 19        permanency goal;20            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 21        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 22        this familial identity;23            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 24        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 25        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of 26        the Children and Family Services Act, in a certified   HB4966- 61 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of 2        the Child Care Act of 1969;3            (v) whether the minor is already placed in a 4        pre-adoptive home, and if not, whether such a home has 5        been identified; and6            (vi) whether the parent or parents have been 7        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 8        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 9        parents have as to the permanency goal.10        (E) Adoption, provided that parental rights have been 11    terminated or relinquished.12        (F) Provided that permanency goals (A) through (E) 13    have been deemed inappropriate and not in the minor's best 14    interests, the minor over age 15 will be in substitute 15    care pending independence. In selecting this permanency 16    goal, the Department of Children and Family Services may 17    provide services to enable reunification and to strengthen 18    the minor's connections with family, fictive kin, and 19    other responsible adults, provided the services are in the 20    minor's best interest. The services shall be documented in 21    the service plan. 22        (G) The minor will be in substitute care because the 23    minor cannot be provided for in a home environment due to 24    developmental disabilities or mental illness or because 25    the minor is a danger to self or others, provided that 26    goals (A) through (E) have been deemed inappropriate and   HB4966- 62 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    not in the child's best interests.2    In selecting any permanency goal, the court shall indicate 3in writing the reasons the goal was selected and why the 4preceding goals were deemed inappropriate and not in the 5child's best interest. Where the court has selected a 6permanency goal other than (A), (B), or (B-1), the Department 7of Children and Family Services shall not provide further 8reunification services, except as provided in paragraph (F) of 9this subsection (2.3), but shall provide services consistent 10with the goal selected.11        (H) Notwithstanding any other provision in this 12    Section, the court may select the goal of continuing 13    foster care as a permanency goal if: 14            (1) The Department of Children and Family Services 15        has custody and guardianship of the minor; 16            (2) The court has deemed all other permanency 17        goals inappropriate based on the child's best 18        interest; 19            (3) The court has found compelling reasons, based 20        on written documentation reviewed by the court, to 21        place the minor in continuing foster care. Compelling 22        reasons include: 23                (a) the child does not wish to be adopted or to 24            be placed in the guardianship of the minor's 25            relative, certified relative caregiver, or foster 26            care placement;   HB4966- 63 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1                (b) the child exhibits an extreme level of 2            need such that the removal of the child from the 3            minor's placement would be detrimental to the 4            child; or 5                (c) the child who is the subject of the 6            permanency hearing has existing close and strong 7            bonds with a sibling, and achievement of another 8            permanency goal would substantially interfere with 9            the subject child's sibling relationship, taking 10            into consideration the nature and extent of the 11            relationship, and whether ongoing contact is in 12            the subject child's best interest, including 13            long-term emotional interest, as compared with the 14            legal and emotional benefit of permanence; 15            (4) The child has lived with the relative, 16        certified relative caregiver, or foster parent for at 17        least one year; and 18            (5) The relative, certified relative caregiver, or 19        foster parent currently caring for the child is 20        willing and capable of providing the child with a 21        stable and permanent environment. 22    (2.4) The court shall set a permanency goal that is in the 23best interest of the child. In determining that goal, the 24court shall consult with the minor in an age-appropriate 25manner regarding the proposed permanency or transition plan 26for the minor. The court's determination shall include the   HB4966- 64 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1following factors:2        (A) Age of the child.3        (B) Options available for permanence, including both 4    out-of-state and in-state placement options.5        (C) Current placement of the child and the intent of 6    the family regarding subsidized guardianship and adoption.7        (D) Emotional, physical, and mental status or 8    condition of the child.9        (E) Types of services previously offered and whether 10    or not the services were successful and, if not 11    successful, the reasons the services failed.12        (F) Availability of services currently needed and 13    whether the services exist.14        (G) Status of siblings of the minor.15        (H) If the minor is not currently in a placement 16    likely to achieve permanency, whether there is an 17    identified and willing potential permanent caregiver for 18    the minor, and if so, that potential permanent caregiver's 19    intent regarding guardianship and adoption. 20    The court shall consider (i) the permanency goal contained 21in the service plan, (ii) the appropriateness of the services 22contained in the plan and whether those services have been 23provided, (iii) whether reasonable efforts have been made by 24all the parties to the service plan to achieve the goal, and 25(iv) whether the plan and goal have been achieved. All 26evidence relevant to determining these questions, including   HB4966- 65 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1oral and written reports, may be admitted and may be relied on 2to the extent of their probative value.3    The court shall make findings as to whether, in violation 4of Section 8.2 of the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 5Act, any portion of the service plan compels a child or parent 6to engage in any activity or refrain from any activity that is 7not reasonably related to remedying a condition or conditions 8that gave rise or which could give rise to any finding of child 9abuse or neglect. The services contained in the service plan 10shall include services reasonably related to remedy the 11conditions that gave rise to removal of the child from the home 12of the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian or that 13the court has found must be remedied prior to returning the 14child home. Any tasks the court requires of the parents, 15guardian, or legal custodian or child prior to returning the 16child home must be reasonably related to remedying a condition 17or conditions that gave rise to or which could give rise to any 18finding of child abuse or neglect. 19    If the permanency goal is to return home, the court shall 20make findings that identify any problems that are causing 21continued placement of the children away from the home and 22identify what outcomes would be considered a resolution to 23these problems. The court shall explain to the parents that 24these findings are based on the information that the court has 25at that time and may be revised, should additional evidence be 26presented to the court.   HB4966- 66 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    The court shall review the Sibling Contact Support Plan 2developed or modified under subsection (f) of Section 7.4 of 3the Children and Family Services Act, if applicable. If the 4Department has not convened a meeting to develop or modify a 5Sibling Contact Support Plan, or if the court finds that the 6existing Plan is not in the child's best interest, the court 7may enter an order requiring the Department to develop, 8modify, or implement a Sibling Contact Support Plan, or order 9mediation. 10    The Beginning July 1, 2025, the court shall review the 11Ongoing Family Finding and Relative Engagement Plan required 12under Section 2-27.3. If the court finds that the plan is not 13in the minor's best interest, the court shall enter specific 14factual findings and order the Department to modify the plan 15consistent with the court's findings. 16    If the goal has been achieved, the court shall enter 17orders that are necessary to conform the minor's legal custody 18and status to those findings.19    If, after receiving evidence, the court determines that 20the services contained in the plan are not reasonably 21calculated to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, 22the court shall put in writing the factual basis supporting 23the determination and enter specific findings based on the 24evidence. The court also shall enter an order for the 25Department to develop and implement a new service plan or to 26implement changes to the current service plan consistent with   HB4966- 67 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1the court's findings. The new service plan shall be filed with 2the court and served on all parties within 45 days of the date 3of the order. The court shall continue the matter until the new 4service plan is filed. Except as authorized by subsection 5(2.5) of this Section and as otherwise specifically authorized 6by law, the court is not empowered under this Section to order 7specific placements, specific services, or specific service 8providers to be included in the service plan.9    A guardian or custodian appointed by the court pursuant to 10this Act shall file updated case plans with the court every 6 11months.12    Rights of wards of the court under this Act are 13enforceable against any public agency by complaints for relief 14by mandamus filed in any proceedings brought under this Act.15    (2.5) If, after reviewing the evidence, including evidence 16from the Department, the court determines that the minor's 17current or planned placement is not necessary or appropriate 18to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, the court 19shall put in writing the factual basis supporting its 20determination and enter specific findings based on the 21evidence. If the court finds that the minor's current or 22planned placement is not necessary or appropriate, the court 23may enter an order directing the Department to implement a 24recommendation by the minor's treating clinician or a 25clinician contracted by the Department to evaluate the minor 26or a recommendation made by the Department. If the Department   HB4966- 68 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1places a minor in a placement under an order entered under this 2subsection (2.5), the Department has the authority to remove 3the minor from that placement when a change in circumstances 4necessitates the removal to protect the minor's health, 5safety, and best interest. If the Department determines 6removal is necessary, the Department shall notify the parties 7of the planned placement change in writing no later than 10 8days prior to the implementation of its determination unless 9remaining in the placement poses an imminent risk of harm to 10the minor, in which case the Department shall notify the 11parties of the placement change in writing immediately 12following the implementation of its decision. The Department 13shall notify others of the decision to change the minor's 14placement as required by Department rule. 15    (3) Following the permanency hearing, the court shall 16enter a written order that includes the determinations 17required under subsections (2) and (2.3) of this Section and 18sets forth the following:19        (a) The future status of the minor, including the 20    permanency goal, and any order necessary to conform the 21    minor's legal custody and status to such determination; or22        (b) If the permanency goal of the minor cannot be 23    achieved immediately, the specific reasons for continuing 24    the minor in the care of the Department of Children and 25    Family Services or other agency for short-term placement, 26    and the following determinations:  HB4966- 69 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1            (i) (Blank).2            (ii) Whether the services required by the court 3        and by any service plan prepared within the prior 6 4        months have been provided and (A) if so, whether the 5        services were reasonably calculated to facilitate the 6        achievement of the permanency goal or (B) if not 7        provided, why the services were not provided.8            (iii) Whether the minor's current or planned 9        placement is necessary, and appropriate to the plan 10        and goal, recognizing the right of minors to the least 11        restrictive (most family-like) setting available and 12        in close proximity to the parents' home consistent 13        with the health, safety, best interest, and special 14        needs of the minor and, if the minor is placed 15        out-of-state, whether the out-of-state placement 16        continues to be appropriate and consistent with the 17        health, safety, and best interest of the minor and, if 18        the minor is placed out-of-state, whether the 19        out-of-state placement continues to be appropriate and 20        consistent with the health, safety, well-being, and 21        best interest of the minor with sufficient protective 22        measures or efforts taken by the public agency that is 23        the custodian or guardian of the minor as required 24        under Section 7.30 of the Children and Family Services 25        Act.26            (iv) (Blank).  HB4966- 70 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1            (v) (Blank).2    (4) The minor or any person interested in the minor may 3apply to the court for a change in custody of the minor and the 4appointment of a new custodian or guardian of the person or for 5the restoration of the minor to the custody of the minor's 6parents or former guardian or custodian.7    When return home is not selected as the permanency goal:8        (a) The Department, the minor, or the current foster 9    parent or relative caregiver seeking private guardianship 10    may file a motion for private guardianship of the minor. 11    Appointment of a guardian under this Section requires 12    approval of the court.13        (b) The State's Attorney may file a motion to 14    terminate parental rights of any parent who has failed to 15    make reasonable efforts to correct the conditions which 16    led to the removal of the child or reasonable progress 17    toward the return of the child, as defined in subdivision 18    (D)(m) of Section 1 of the Adoption Act or for whom any 19    other unfitness ground for terminating parental rights as 20    defined in subdivision (D) of Section 1 of the Adoption 21    Act exists.22        When parental rights have been terminated for a 23    minimum of 3 years and the child who is the subject of the 24    permanency hearing is 13 years old or older and is not 25    currently placed in a placement likely to achieve 26    permanency, the Department of Children and Family Services   HB4966- 71 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    shall make reasonable efforts to locate parents whose 2    rights have been terminated, except when the Court 3    determines that those efforts would be futile or 4    inconsistent with the subject child's best interests. The 5    Department of Children and Family Services shall assess 6    the appropriateness of the parent whose rights have been 7    terminated, and shall, as appropriate, foster and support 8    connections between the parent whose rights have been 9    terminated and the youth. The Department of Children and 10    Family Services shall document its determinations and 11    efforts to foster connections in the child's case plan. 12    Custody of the minor shall not be restored to any parent, 13guardian, or legal custodian in any case in which the minor is 14found to be neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent 15under Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared 16for at home without endangering the minor's health or safety 17and it is in the best interest of the minor, and if such 18neglect, abuse, or dependency is found by the court under 19paragraph (1) of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about 20due to the acts or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, 21or legal custodian, until such time as an investigation is 22made as provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the 23issue of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor and 24the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to 25care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 26parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the   HB4966- 72 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1minor. If a motion is filed to modify or vacate a private 2guardianship order and return the child to a parent, guardian, 3or legal custodian, the court may order the Department of 4Children and Family Services to assess the minor's current and 5proposed living arrangements and to provide ongoing monitoring 6of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor during 7the pendency of the motion to assist the court in making that 8determination. In the event that the minor has attained 18 9years of age and the guardian or custodian petitions the court 10for an order terminating the minor's guardianship or custody, 11guardianship or custody shall terminate automatically 30 days 12after the receipt of the petition unless the court orders 13otherwise. No legal custodian or guardian of the person may be 14removed without the legal custodian's or guardian's consent 15until given notice and an opportunity to be heard by the court.16    When the court orders a child restored to the custody of 17the parent or parents, the court shall order the parent or 18parents to cooperate with the Department of Children and 19Family Services and comply with the terms of an aftercare 20after-care plan, or risk the loss of custody of the child and 21possible termination of their parental rights. The court may 22also enter an order of protective supervision in accordance 23with Section 2-24.24    If the minor is being restored to the custody of a parent, 25legal custodian, or guardian who lives outside of Illinois, 26and an Interstate Compact has been requested and refused, the   HB4966- 73 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1court may order the Department of Children and Family Services 2to arrange for an assessment of the minor's proposed living 3arrangement and for ongoing monitoring of the health, safety, 4and best interest of the minor and compliance with any order of 5protective supervision entered in accordance with Section 62-24. 7    (5) Whenever a parent, guardian, or legal custodian files 8a motion for restoration of custody of the minor, and the minor 9was adjudicated neglected, abused, or dependent as a result of 10physical abuse, the court shall cause to be made an 11investigation as to whether the movant has ever been charged 12with or convicted of any criminal offense which would indicate 13the likelihood of any further physical abuse to the minor. 14Evidence of such criminal convictions shall be taken into 15account in determining whether the minor can be cared for at 16home without endangering the minor's health or safety and 17fitness of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian.18        (a) Any agency of this State or any subdivision 19    thereof shall cooperate with the agent of the court in 20    providing any information sought in the investigation.21        (b) The information derived from the investigation and 22    any conclusions or recommendations derived from the 23    information shall be provided to the parent, guardian, or 24    legal custodian seeking restoration of custody prior to 25    the hearing on fitness and the movant shall have an 26    opportunity at the hearing to refute the information or   HB4966- 74 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    contest its significance.2        (c) All information obtained from any investigation 3    shall be confidential as provided in Section 5-150 of this 4    Act.5(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 6103-171, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1061, eff. 72-5-25; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; revised 8-20-25.) 8    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-107)9    Sec. 2-28. Court review. 10    (1) The court may require any legal custodian or guardian 11of the person appointed under this Act to report periodically 12to the court or may cite the legal custodian or guardian into 13court and require the legal custodian, guardian, or the legal 14custodian's or guardian's agency to make a full and accurate 15report of the doings of the legal custodian, guardian, or 16agency on behalf of the minor. The custodian or guardian, 17within 10 days after such citation, or earlier if the court 18determines it to be necessary to protect the health, safety, 19or welfare of the minor, shall make the report, either in 20writing verified by affidavit or orally under oath in open 21court, or otherwise as the court directs. Upon the hearing of 22the report the court may remove the custodian or guardian and 23appoint another in the custodian's or guardian's stead or 24restore the minor to the custody of the minor's parents or 25former guardian or custodian. However, custody of the minor   HB4966- 75 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1shall not be restored to any parent, guardian, or legal 2custodian in any case in which the minor is found to be 3neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent under 4Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared for at 5home without endangering the minor's health or safety and it 6is in the best interests of the minor, and if such neglect, 7abuse, or dependency is found by the court under paragraph (1) 8of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about due to the acts 9or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, or legal 10custodian, until such time as an investigation is made as 11provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the issue of 12the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to 13care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 14parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the 15minor.16    (1.5) The public agency that is the custodian or guardian 17of the minor shall file a written report with the court no 18later than 15 days after a minor in the agency's care remains:19        (1) in a shelter placement beyond 30 days;20        (2) in a psychiatric hospital past the time when the 21    minor is clinically ready for discharge or beyond medical 22    necessity for the minor's health; or23        (3) in a detention center or Department of Juvenile 24    Justice facility solely because the public agency cannot 25    find an appropriate placement for the minor.26    The report shall explain the steps the agency is taking to   HB4966- 76 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1ensure the minor is placed appropriately, how the minor's 2needs are being met in the minor's shelter placement, and if a 3future placement has been identified by the Department, why 4the anticipated placement is appropriate for the needs of the 5minor and the anticipated placement date. 6    (1.6) Within 30 days after placing a child in its care in a 7qualified residential treatment program, as defined by the 8federal Social Security Act, the Department of Children and 9Family Services shall prepare a written report for filing with 10the court and send copies of the report to all parties. Within 1120 days of the filing of the report, or as soon thereafter as 12the court's schedule allows but not more than 60 days from the 13date of placement, the court shall hold a hearing to consider 14the Department's report and determine whether placement of the 15child in a qualified residential treatment program provides 16the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child 17in the least restrictive environment and if the placement is 18consistent with the short-term and long-term goals for the 19child, as specified in the permanency plan for the child. The 20court shall approve or disapprove the placement. If 21applicable, the requirements of Sections 2-27.1 and 2-27.2 of 22the Act and Sections 7.30 and 7.31 of the Children and Family 23Services Act must also be met. The Department's written report 24and the court's written determination shall be included in and 25made part of the case plan for the child. If the child remains 26placed in a qualified residential treatment program, the   HB4966- 77 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1Department shall submit evidence at each status and permanency 2hearing: 3        (A) demonstrating that ongoing on-going assessment of 4    the strengths and needs of the child continues to support 5    the determination that the child's needs cannot be met 6    through placement in a foster family home, that the 7    placement provides the most effective and appropriate 8    level of care for the child in the least restrictive, 9    appropriate environment, and that the placement is 10    consistent with the short-term and long-term permanency 11    goal for the child, as specified in the permanency plan 12    for the child; 13        (B) documenting the specific treatment or service 14    needs that should be met for the child in the placement and 15    the length of time the child is expected to need the 16    treatment or services; 17        (C) detailing the efforts made by the agency to 18    prepare the child to return home or to be placed with a fit 19    and willing relative, a legal guardian, or an adoptive 20    parent, or in a foster family home; 21        (D) beginning July 1, 2025, documenting the 22    Department's efforts regarding ongoing family finding and 23    relative engagement required under Section 2-27.3; and 24        (E) detailing efforts to ensure the minor is engaged 25    in age and developmentally appropriate activities to 26    develop life skills, which may include extracurricular   HB4966- 78 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    activities, coaching by caregivers, or instruction in 2    individual or group settings. For minors who have 3    participated in life skills assessments, the results of 4    such assessments and how the minor's identified needs are 5    being addressed; and . 6        (F) if applicable, the efforts made by the public 7    agency that is guardian or custodian of the minor to 8    monitor and mitigate the risk of adverse action, as 9    defined in subsection (b) of Section 7.30, relevant to the 10    child's circumstances in an out-of-state placement. 11    (2) The first permanency hearing shall be conducted by the 12judge. Subsequent permanency hearings may be heard by a judge 13or by hearing officers appointed or approved by the court in 14the manner set forth in Section 2-28.1 of this Act. The initial 15hearing shall be held (a) within 12 months from the date 16temporary custody was taken, regardless of whether an 17adjudication or dispositional hearing has been completed 18within that time frame, (b) if the parental rights of both 19parents have been terminated in accordance with the procedure 20described in subsection (5) of Section 2-21, within 30 days of 21the order for termination of parental rights and appointment 22of a guardian with power to consent to adoption, or (c) in 23accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2-13.1. Subsequent 24permanency hearings shall be held every 6 months or more 25frequently if necessary in the court's determination following 26the initial permanency hearing, in accordance with the   HB4966- 79 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1standards set forth in this Section, until the court 2determines that the plan and goal have been achieved. Once the 3plan and goal have been achieved, if the minor remains in 4substitute care, the case shall be reviewed at least every 6 5months thereafter, subject to the provisions of this Section, 6unless the minor is placed in the guardianship of a suitable 7relative or other person and the court determines that further 8monitoring by the court does not further the health, safety, 9or best interest of the child and that this is a stable 10permanent placement. The permanency hearings must occur within 11the time frames set forth in this subsection and may not be 12delayed in anticipation of a report from any source or due to 13the agency's failure to timely file its written report (this 14written report means the one required under the next paragraph 15and does not mean the service plan also referred to in that 16paragraph).17    The public agency that is the custodian or guardian of the 18minor, or another agency responsible for the minor's care, 19shall ensure that all parties to the permanency hearings are 20provided a copy of the most recent service plan prepared 21within the prior 6 months at least 14 days in advance of the 22hearing. If not contained in the agency's service plan, the 23agency shall also include a report setting forth the 24following:25        (A) any special physical, psychological, educational, 26    medical, emotional, or other needs of the minor or the   HB4966- 80 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    minor's family that are relevant to a permanency or 2    placement determination, and for any minor age 16 or over, 3    a written description of the programs and services that 4    will enable the minor to prepare for independent living; 5        (B) beginning July 1, 2025, a written description of 6    ongoing family finding and relative engagement efforts in 7    accordance with the requirements under Section 2-27.3 the 8    agency has undertaken since the most recent report to the 9    court to plan for the emotional and legal permanency of 10    the minor;11        (C) whether a minor is placed in a licensed child care 12    facility under a corrective plan by the Department due to 13    concerns impacting the minor's safety and well-being. The 14    report shall explain the steps the Department is taking to 15    ensure the safety and well-being of the minor and that the 16    minor's needs are met in the facility;17        (C-1) if the minor is placed outside the State of 18    Illinois in a jurisdiction in which the minor is at risk of 19    adverse action as defined in subsection (b) of Section 20    7.30 of the Children and Family Services Act based on the 21    minor's identified needs, an explanation of the adverse 22    action and the efforts made by the public agency that is 23    the custodian or guardian of the minor to meet its 24    obligations under Section 7.30 of the Children and Family 25    Services Act;26        (C-2) an explanation of the minor's expressed   HB4966- 81 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    preferences regarding placement, and for youth age 8 or 2    older, whether the burden was met in consideration of this 3    preference in accordance with subsections (d) and (e) of 4    Section 7.31 of the Children and Family Services Act; and 5        (D) detail regarding what progress or lack of progress 6    the parent has made in correcting the conditions requiring 7    the child to be in care; whether the child can be returned 8    home without jeopardizing the child's health, safety, and 9    welfare, what permanency goal is recommended to be in the 10    best interests of the child, and the reasons for the 11    recommendation. If a permanency goal under paragraph (A), 12    (B), or (B-1) of subsection (2.3) have been deemed 13    inappropriate and not in the minor's best interest, the 14    report must include the following information:15            (i) confirmation that the caseworker has discussed 16        the permanency options and subsidies available for 17        guardianship and adoption with the minor's caregivers, 18        the minor's parents, as appropriate, and has discussed 19        the available permanency options with the minor in an 20        age-appropriate manner;21            (ii) confirmation that the caseworker has 22        discussed with the minor's caregivers, the minor's 23        parents, as appropriate, and the minor as 24        age-appropriate, the distinctions between guardianship 25        and adoption, including, but not limited to, that 26        guardianship does not require termination of the   HB4966- 82 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        parent's rights or the consent of the parent;2            (iii) a description of the stated preferences and 3        concerns, if any, the minor, the parent as 4        appropriate, and the caregiver expressed relating to 5        the options of guardianship and adoption, and the 6        reasons for the preferences;7            (iv) if the minor is not currently in a placement 8        that will provide permanency, identification of all 9        persons presently willing and able to provide 10        permanency to the minor through either guardianship or 11        adoption, and beginning July 1, 2025, if none are 12        available, a description of the efforts made in 13        accordance with Section 2-27.3; and14            (v) state the recommended permanency goal, why 15        that goal is recommended, and why the other potential 16        goals were not recommended. 17    The caseworker must appear and testify at the permanency 18hearing. If a permanency hearing has not previously been 19scheduled by the court, the moving party shall move for the 20setting of a permanency hearing and the entry of an order 21within the time frames set forth in this subsection.22    (2.3) At the permanency hearing, the court shall determine 23the permanency goal of the child. The court shall set one of 24the following permanency goals:25        (A) The minor will be returned home by a specific date 26    within 5 months.  HB4966- 83 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        (B) The minor will be in short-term care with a 2    continued goal to return home within a period not to 3    exceed one year, where the progress of the parent or 4    parents is substantial giving particular consideration to 5    the age and individual needs of the minor.6        (B-1) The minor will be in short-term care with a 7    continued goal to return home pending a status hearing. 8    When the court finds that a parent has not made reasonable 9    efforts or reasonable progress to date, the court shall 10    identify what actions the parent and the Department must 11    take in order to justify a finding of reasonable efforts 12    or reasonable progress and shall set a status hearing to 13    be held not earlier than 9 months from the date of 14    adjudication nor later than 11 months from the date of 15    adjudication during which the parent's progress will again 16    be reviewed.17        If the court has determined that goals (A), (B), and 18    (B-1) are not appropriate and not in the minor's best 19    interest, the court may select one of the following goals: 20    (C), (D), (E), (F), (G), or (H) for the minor as 21    appropriate and based on the best interests of the minor. 22    The court shall determine the appropriate goal for the 23    minor based on best interest factors and any 24    considerations outlined in that goal. 25        (C) The guardianship of the minor shall be transferred 26    to an individual or couple on a permanent basis. Prior to   HB4966- 84 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    changing the goal to guardianship, the court shall 2    consider the following: 3            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 4        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 5        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;6            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 7        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and 8        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the 9        permanency goal;10            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 11        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 12        this familial identity;13            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 14        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 15        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of 16        the Children and Family Services Act or in a certified 17        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of 18        the Child Care Act of 1969; and19            (v) whether the parent or parents have been 20        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 21        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 22        parents have as to the permanency goal. 23        (D) The minor will be in substitute care pending court 24    determination on termination of parental rights. Prior to 25    changing the goal to substitute care pending court 26    determination on termination of parental rights, the court   HB4966- 85 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    shall consider the following: 2            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 3        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 4        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;5            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 6        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and 7        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the 8        permanency goal;9            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 10        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 11        this familial identity;12            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 13        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 14        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of 15        the Children and Family Services Act, in a certified 16        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of 17        the Child Care Act of 1969;18            (v) whether the minor is already placed in a 19        pre-adoptive home, and if not, whether such a home has 20        been identified; and21            (vi) whether the parent or parents have been 22        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 23        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 24        parents have as to the permanency goal.25        (E) Adoption, provided that parental rights have been 26    terminated or relinquished.  HB4966- 86 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        (F) Provided that permanency goals (A) through (E) 2    have been deemed inappropriate and not in the minor's best 3    interests, the minor over age 15 will be in substitute 4    care pending independence. In selecting this permanency 5    goal, the Department of Children and Family Services may 6    provide services to enable reunification and to strengthen 7    the minor's connections with family, fictive kin, and 8    other responsible adults, provided the services are in the 9    minor's best interest. The services shall be documented in 10    the service plan. 11        (G) The minor will be in substitute care because the 12    minor cannot be provided for in a home environment due to 13    developmental disabilities or mental illness or because 14    the minor is a danger to self or others, provided that 15    goals (A) through (E) have been deemed inappropriate and 16    not in the child's best interests.17    In selecting any permanency goal, the court shall indicate 18in writing the reasons the goal was selected and why the 19preceding goals were deemed inappropriate and not in the 20child's best interest. Where the court has selected a 21permanency goal other than (A), (B), or (B-1), the Department 22of Children and Family Services shall not provide further 23reunification services, except as provided in paragraph (F) of 24this subsection (2.3), but shall provide services consistent 25with the goal selected.26        (H) Notwithstanding any other provision in this   HB4966- 87 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    Section, the court may select the goal of continuing 2    foster care as a permanency goal if: 3            (1) The Department of Children and Family Services 4        has custody and guardianship of the minor; 5            (2) The court has deemed all other permanency 6        goals inappropriate based on the child's best 7        interest; 8            (3) The court has found compelling reasons, based 9        on written documentation reviewed by the court, to 10        place the minor in continuing foster care. Compelling 11        reasons include: 12                (a) the child does not wish to be adopted or to 13            be placed in the guardianship of the minor's 14            relative, certified relative caregiver, or foster 15            care placement; 16                (b) the child exhibits an extreme level of 17            need such that the removal of the child from the 18            minor's placement would be detrimental to the 19            child; or 20                (c) the child who is the subject of the 21            permanency hearing has existing close and strong 22            bonds with a sibling, and achievement of another 23            permanency goal would substantially interfere with 24            the subject child's sibling relationship, taking 25            into consideration the nature and extent of the 26            relationship, and whether ongoing contact is in   HB4966- 88 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1            the subject child's best interest, including 2            long-term emotional interest, as compared with the 3            legal and emotional benefit of permanence; 4            (4) The child has lived with the relative, 5        certified relative caregiver, or foster parent for at 6        least one year; and 7            (5) The relative, certified relative caregiver, or 8        foster parent currently caring for the child is 9        willing and capable of providing the child with a 10        stable and permanent environment. 11    (2.4) The court shall set a permanency goal that is in the 12best interest of the child. In determining that goal, the 13court shall consult with the minor in an age-appropriate 14manner regarding the proposed permanency or transition plan 15for the minor. The court's determination shall include the 16following factors:17        (A) Age of the child.18        (B) Options available for permanence, including both 19    out-of-state and in-state placement options.20        (C) Current placement of the child and the intent of 21    the family regarding subsidized guardianship and adoption.22        (D) Emotional, physical, and mental status or 23    condition of the child.24        (E) Types of services previously offered and whether 25    or not the services were successful and, if not 26    successful, the reasons the services failed.  HB4966- 89 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        (F) Availability of services currently needed and 2    whether the services exist.3        (G) Status of siblings of the minor.4        (H) If the minor is not currently in a placement 5    likely to achieve permanency, whether there is an 6    identified and willing potential permanent caregiver for 7    the minor, and if so, that potential permanent caregiver's 8    intent regarding guardianship and adoption. 9    The court shall consider (i) the permanency goal contained 10in the service plan, (ii) the appropriateness of the services 11contained in the plan and whether those services have been 12provided, (iii) whether reasonable efforts have been made by 13all the parties to the service plan to achieve the goal, and 14(iv) whether the plan and goal have been achieved. All 15evidence relevant to determining these questions, including 16oral and written reports, may be admitted and may be relied on 17to the extent of their probative value.18    The court shall make findings as to whether, in violation 19of Section 8.2 of the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 20Act, any portion of the service plan compels a child or parent 21to engage in any activity or refrain from any activity that is 22not reasonably related to remedying a condition or conditions 23that gave rise or which could give rise to any finding of child 24abuse or neglect. The services contained in the service plan 25shall include services reasonably related to remedy the 26conditions that gave rise to removal of the child from the home   HB4966- 90 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1of the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian or that 2the court has found must be remedied prior to returning the 3child home. Any tasks the court requires of the parents, 4guardian, or legal custodian or child prior to returning the 5child home must be reasonably related to remedying a condition 6or conditions that gave rise to or which could give rise to any 7finding of child abuse or neglect. 8    If the permanency goal is to return home, the court shall 9make findings that identify any problems that are causing 10continued placement of the children away from the home and 11identify what outcomes would be considered a resolution to 12these problems. The court shall explain to the parents that 13these findings are based on the information that the court has 14at that time and may be revised, should additional evidence be 15presented to the court. 16    The court shall review the Sibling Contact Support Plan 17developed or modified under subsection (f) of Section 7.4 of 18the Children and Family Services Act, if applicable. If the 19Department has not convened a meeting to develop or modify a 20Sibling Contact Support Plan, or if the court finds that the 21existing Plan is not in the child's best interest, the court 22may enter an order requiring the Department to develop, 23modify, or implement a Sibling Contact Support Plan, or order 24mediation. 25    The court shall review the Department's efforts to provide 26the minor with age and developmentally appropriate life   HB4966- 91 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1skills. If the court finds the Department's efforts are not in 2the minor's best interest, the court may enter an order 3requiring the Department to develop, modify, or implement the 4service plan to develop the minor's life skills in an age and 5developmentally appropriate manner. 6    The Beginning July 1, 2025, the court shall review the 7Ongoing Family Finding and Relative Engagement Plan required 8under Section 2-27.3. If the court finds that the plan is not 9in the minor's best interest, the court shall enter specific 10factual findings and order the Department to modify the plan 11consistent with the court's findings. 12    If the goal has been achieved, the court shall enter 13orders that are necessary to conform the minor's legal custody 14and status to those findings.15    If, after receiving evidence, the court determines that 16the services contained in the plan are not reasonably 17calculated to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, 18the court shall put in writing the factual basis supporting 19the determination and enter specific findings based on the 20evidence. The court also shall enter an order for the 21Department to develop and implement a new service plan or to 22implement changes to the current service plan consistent with 23the court's findings. The new service plan shall be filed with 24the court and served on all parties within 45 days of the date 25of the order. The court shall continue the matter until the new 26service plan is filed. Except as authorized by subsection   HB4966- 92 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1(2.5) of this Section and as otherwise specifically authorized 2by law, the court is not empowered under this Section to order 3specific placements, specific services, or specific service 4providers to be included in the service plan.5    A guardian or custodian appointed by the court pursuant to 6this Act shall file updated case plans with the court every 6 7months.8    Rights of wards of the court under this Act are 9enforceable against any public agency by complaints for relief 10by mandamus filed in any proceedings brought under this Act.11    (2.5) If, after reviewing the evidence, including evidence 12from the Department, the court determines that the minor's 13current or planned placement is not necessary or appropriate 14to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, the court 15shall put in writing the factual basis supporting its 16determination and enter specific findings based on the 17evidence. If the court finds that the minor's current or 18planned placement is not necessary or appropriate, the court 19may enter an order directing the Department to implement a 20recommendation by the minor's treating clinician or a 21clinician contracted by the Department to evaluate the minor 22or a recommendation made by the Department. If the Department 23places a minor in a placement under an order entered under this 24subsection (2.5), the Department has the authority to remove 25the minor from that placement when a change in circumstances 26necessitates the removal to protect the minor's health,   HB4966- 93 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1safety, and best interest. If the Department determines 2removal is necessary, the Department shall notify the parties 3of the planned placement change in writing no later than 10 4days prior to the implementation of its determination unless 5remaining in the placement poses an imminent risk of harm to 6the minor, in which case the Department shall notify the 7parties of the placement change in writing immediately 8following the implementation of its decision. The Department 9shall notify others of the decision to change the minor's 10placement as required by Department rule. 11    (3) Following the permanency hearing, the court shall 12enter a written order that includes the determinations 13required under subsections (2) and (2.3) of this Section and 14sets forth the following:15        (a) The future status of the minor, including the 16    permanency goal, and any order necessary to conform the 17    minor's legal custody and status to such determination; or18        (b) If the permanency goal of the minor cannot be 19    achieved immediately, the specific reasons for continuing 20    the minor in the care of the Department of Children and 21    Family Services or other agency for short-term placement, 22    and the following determinations:23            (i) (Blank).24            (ii) Whether the services required by the court 25        and by any service plan prepared within the prior 6 26        months have been provided and (A) if so, whether the   HB4966- 94 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1        services were reasonably calculated to facilitate the 2        achievement of the permanency goal or (B) if not 3        provided, why the services were not provided.4            (iii) Whether the minor's current or planned 5        placement is necessary, and appropriate to the plan 6        and goal, recognizing the right of minors to the least 7        restrictive (most family-like) setting available and 8        in close proximity to the parents' home consistent 9        with the health, safety, best interest, and special 10        needs of the minor and, if the minor is placed 11        out-of-state, whether the out-of-state placement 12        continues to be appropriate and consistent with the 13        health, safety, and best interest of the minor, and if 14        the minor is placed out-of-state, whether the 15        out-of-state placement continues to be appropriate and 16        consistent with the health, safety, well-being, and 17        best interest of the minor with sufficient protective 18        measures or efforts taken by the public agency that is 19        the custodian or guardian of the minor as required 20        under Section 7.30 of the Children and Family Services 21        Act.22            (iv) (Blank).23            (v) (Blank).24    If the court sets a permanency goal of independence or if 25the minor is 17 years of age or older, the court shall schedule 26a Successful Transition to Adulthood Review hearing in   HB4966- 95 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1accordance with Section 2-28.2. 2    (4) The minor or any person interested in the minor may 3apply to the court for a change in custody of the minor and the 4appointment of a new custodian or guardian of the person or for 5the restoration of the minor to the custody of the minor's 6parents or former guardian or custodian.7    When return home is not selected as the permanency goal:8        (a) The Department, the minor, or the current foster 9    parent or relative caregiver seeking private guardianship 10    may file a motion for private guardianship of the minor. 11    Appointment of a guardian under this Section requires 12    approval of the court.13        (b) The State's Attorney may file a motion to 14    terminate parental rights of any parent who has failed to 15    make reasonable efforts to correct the conditions which 16    led to the removal of the child or reasonable progress 17    toward the return of the child, as defined in subdivision 18    (D)(m) of Section 1 of the Adoption Act or for whom any 19    other unfitness ground for terminating parental rights as 20    defined in subdivision (D) of Section 1 of the Adoption 21    Act exists.22        When parental rights have been terminated for a 23    minimum of 3 years and the child who is the subject of the 24    permanency hearing is 13 years old or older and is not 25    currently placed in a placement likely to achieve 26    permanency, the Department of Children and Family Services   HB4966- 96 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    shall make reasonable efforts to locate parents whose 2    rights have been terminated, except when the Court 3    determines that those efforts would be futile or 4    inconsistent with the subject child's best interests. The 5    Department of Children and Family Services shall assess 6    the appropriateness of the parent whose rights have been 7    terminated, and shall, as appropriate, foster and support 8    connections between the parent whose rights have been 9    terminated and the youth. The Department of Children and 10    Family Services shall document its determinations and 11    efforts to foster connections in the child's case plan. 12    Custody of the minor shall not be restored to any parent, 13guardian, or legal custodian in any case in which the minor is 14found to be neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent 15under Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared 16for at home without endangering the minor's health or safety 17and it is in the best interest of the minor, and if such 18neglect, abuse, or dependency is found by the court under 19paragraph (1) of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about 20due to the acts or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, 21or legal custodian, until such time as an investigation is 22made as provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the 23issue of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor and 24the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to 25care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 26parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the   HB4966- 97 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1minor. If a motion is filed to modify or vacate a private 2guardianship order and return the child to a parent, guardian, 3or legal custodian, the court may order the Department of 4Children and Family Services to assess the minor's current and 5proposed living arrangements and to provide ongoing monitoring 6of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor during 7the pendency of the motion to assist the court in making that 8determination. In the event that the minor has attained 18 9years of age and the guardian or custodian petitions the court 10for an order terminating the minor's guardianship or custody, 11guardianship or custody shall terminate automatically 30 days 12after the receipt of the petition unless the court orders 13otherwise. No legal custodian or guardian of the person may be 14removed without the legal custodian's or guardian's consent 15until given notice and an opportunity to be heard by the court.16    When the court orders a child restored to the custody of 17the parent or parents, the court shall order the parent or 18parents to cooperate with the Department of Children and 19Family Services and comply with the terms of an aftercare 20after-care plan, or risk the loss of custody of the child and 21possible termination of their parental rights. The court may 22also enter an order of protective supervision in accordance 23with Section 2-24.24    If the minor is being restored to the custody of a parent, 25legal custodian, or guardian who lives outside of Illinois, 26and an Interstate Compact has been requested and refused, the   HB4966- 98 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1court may order the Department of Children and Family Services 2to arrange for an assessment of the minor's proposed living 3arrangement and for ongoing monitoring of the health, safety, 4and best interest of the minor and compliance with any order of 5protective supervision entered in accordance with Section 62-24. 7    (5) Whenever a parent, guardian, or legal custodian files 8a motion for restoration of custody of the minor, and the minor 9was adjudicated neglected, abused, or dependent as a result of 10physical abuse, the court shall cause to be made an 11investigation as to whether the movant has ever been charged 12with or convicted of any criminal offense which would indicate 13the likelihood of any further physical abuse to the minor. 14Evidence of such criminal convictions shall be taken into 15account in determining whether the minor can be cared for at 16home without endangering the minor's health or safety and 17fitness of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian.18        (a) Any agency of this State or any subdivision 19    thereof shall cooperate with the agent of the court in 20    providing any information sought in the investigation.21        (b) The information derived from the investigation and 22    any conclusions or recommendations derived from the 23    information shall be provided to the parent, guardian, or 24    legal custodian seeking restoration of custody prior to 25    the hearing on fitness and the movant shall have an 26    opportunity at the hearing to refute the information or   HB4966- 99 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1    contest its significance.2        (c) All information obtained from any investigation 3    shall be confidential as provided in Section 5-150 of this 4    Act.5(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 6103-171, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1061, eff. 72-5-25; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; 104-107, eff. 7-1-26; revised 88-20-25.) 9    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 10changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 11that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 12represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 13not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 14made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 15Public Act. 16    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 17severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192027.  HB4966- 100 -LRB104 20048 KTG 33499 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 505/6afrom Ch. 23, par. 5006a4    20 ILCS 505/7from Ch. 23, par. 50075    20 ILCS 505/7.29 new6    20 ILCS 505/7.30 new7    20 ILCS 505/7.31 new8    20 ILCS 505/7.32 new9    20 ILCS 505/7.33 new10    225 ILCS 10/8.1b new11    705 ILCS 405/2-17.5 new12    705 ILCS 405/2-27.213    705 ILCS 405/2-27.4 new14    705 ILCS 405/2-28